The fact remains that Chavez does not understand economics. He's imposed [price controls](http://africa.reuters.com/odd/news/usnN30300735.html) and now even toilet paper is short. The government blames hoarding -- yeah, that's what happens when you impose price controls.  The better way to help poor people is to **give them money**. If you're afraid they'll waste their money on drugs, give them **vouchers**. Further, Chavez [heavily subsidizes oil](http://www.nytimes.com/2007/10/30/world/americas/30venezuela.html?_r=1&amp;oref=slogin), which is actually costing enormous amounts of money.  Chavez will never make any progress while he continues to work against economics.  The "ruling elites" don't rule the country anymore. I'd be more worried about who is holding Chavez and his guys accountable!  By the way, I'm a hardcore liberal, but I understand that economics and progressive policies can be consistent (Gravel understand s this as well -- vouchers for healthcare, taxes on gasoline, ect.)
Why we admired him most` never be afraid risk it all believe in yourself!'
No, Mom! NOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOO!
Great, so he only had sex with *one* nine-year-old girl. For a moment I was worried.
if reddit or anybody in the conde nast family, uses adwords or adsense, than they can't advocate clicking on the ads, either to drive up another advertisers bill (adwords) or to make some web publishher money (adsense)  if reddits users take it upon themselves to click on somebodys google ads with the intention of making things expensive for them, then they are exposing reddit to "civil liability" which is covered under the user agreement.  the individuals participating in this aren't liable for anything, but reddit would be if they allowed it to happen
It's because Wii's are sold out and the price drop. And I'm willing to bet a lot of the people buying up the PS3's now are already Wii owners. Besides, Sony is still losing at least a few hundred dollars per console while Nintendo is making money on the consoles alone. Sony has to sell something in the teens of games/Blu-ray movies per console just to break even. Playstation and PS2 were/are great consoles that are still a lot of fun with a huge variety of games. But Sony's market-share and proprietary format business model is awful and it has infected and seriously damaged their gaming division. I hope their selling more units brings some life to the almost non-existent "console wars," but it seems very unlikely.
Indeed you are correct.  In the end it was for the better.  Love blinds sometimes.
She's an amazing actress, as well as being hot. She will go far.
Violent zealots hiding behind religion suck. (people who vote this down like to drown kittens)
&gt; Religion is simply not going away. The human mind is notorious for clinging to constructs for emotional reasons. It is part of what we are as a species.  Fact: As long as there have been gatherings and communities of people, there has been religion.  Some state that this is very good evidence that, while the religions may all be different in their particulars, perhaps they all fundamentally recognize a basic truth about a spiritual, extra-physical force or being.
We talking McDonalds or homemade Pi?
That's photoshopped!
Hillary, like most other candidates, has an organization of at least 100 people to plan every minutiae of her appearance. 
&gt; No Nordic person ever did anything wrong? never lied, stole or cheated? I think you fail to grasp this "entirely different scale of evil" concept. &gt; ancient Nordic Why are you bringing those fuckers into it? We're talking about Nordic people here. &gt; why are you using the Nordic scale to determine what is evil? Because they exemplify and epitomize human rights. &gt; The Vatican is evil today? Aiding and abetting tax evasion, rape, incest, pederasty, beating children and women, poverty, fascism, population explosion and disease. &gt; on the Catholic scale of evil You mean, by using an inferior morality. You really are fucking disgusting. As all cultural relativists are fucking disgusting.
"If Lenin walked around the offices of a company like Yahoo or Intel or Cisco, he'd think communism had won. Everyone would be wearing the same clothes, have the same kind of office (or rather, cubicle) with the same furnishings, and address one another by their first names instead of by honorifics."  You're thinking mass society here, not communism. Two very different things, but which is always lost on most people.
Welcome to big corporate retail. Don't tell us what you think. Don't tell us how things could be improved. Shut up and work. You'll leave here by either finding a better job outside of big corporate retail, quitting when you've had enough of our Kafkaesque management methods, or (most likely) you'll get fired for some minor infraction (real or perceived) of the aforementioned Kafkaesque management methods.
I don't even know what the hell this is all about, but "joyless down-moders" makes you appear to be. . . uh, right? Funny? 
Genius
I wish I'd had these directions back when I got married. A masterful guide to recording a video of your wedding. 
&gt; I further don't see how repeatedly clicking someone's advertisement with the stated intent to cause damage to their campaign and cost them money needlessly can be considered acceptable behavior.  Sounds dangerously close to democracy if the problem is due to _so many_ people doing it.
It just shows they don't care unless something affects them directly.
Was it "I Got Stoned and I Missed It"? Written by Silverstein, performed by Dr. Hook.
Can we have a cartoon of it so half the extremists's heads explode synchronized?
spice girls. noooooooooooooo.
it's about time?  Why do you guys want control of this but nothing else?  WTF?  I am responsible and I chose to get an ARM, I pay and will pay every month and now I'm going to get punished because of idiots? I know, you bought a PC, some people us PC's for bad, so lets target you and give you a slower internet connection because other people have used PC's irresponsibly.  Everyone on Reddit would say "nooo, that's so wrong"  how is this any different?   Now think about this: When all of these people with ARM's want to refinance in the 3-7 years they WILL NOT BE ABLE TO!  do you think they will be able to sell their homes? No! because no one else will be able to afford a mortgage, so what will happen?  Oh I know, foreclosure.  Sorry for the rant, but this is freaking ridiculous, not only for me but for everyone else with an ARM-lets make life harder for the already at risk people...that makes sense...
I have a citi bank card with zero balance for the sole purpose of raising my credit score (i've had it 22 years). Probably will ditch that after I buy a car in a few months. But my guess is they lost a laptop with a bunch of cardnumbers on it.
We know what we did. We disagree with the unilateral judgement that it was wrong.
You think THAT's Scarry?  THIS is Scarry!  http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Richard_scarry
Christianity didn't insulate the Germans from Nazism, as I've point out elsewhere, so I think you are way off base with your theory.  Not the least because you can be both Christian and racist (Nazism), Orthodox and classist (Russian Communism), or Christian and political (WWI).  It's not as if you are innoculated against ideology or political strife simply by being Christian.  Besides, comparing the atrocities of the last centuries to that of our own is difficult if not impossible.  To be blunt, we kill more people now because there are a) more people TO kill and b) vastly more efficient ways of doing the killing.  Compare the An Shi rebellion in China (33-36 million dead), which lasted from 756 to 763 AD or 7 years, to any major modern conflict like WWI (20+ million) or WWII (40-72 million).  Then realize that every one of those poor Chinese folks was hacked with an axe, stabbed with a sword, pierced by a spear or shot with an arrow.  No machine guns firing thousands of rounds a minute, no bombs leveling entire blocks at a time, no nukes, no napalm.  It is utterly staggering to think of.  How can you compare, for example, the Vietnam War where 40 000 or so American soldiers lost their lives to a battle during the Crusades where 40 000 people died in ONE DAY.  I hate to be jaded, but I suggest you check out the following wikipedia link:  http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Death_toll  Sure, all the Communists are there, but so are a bunch of other conflicts that I more or less guarantee you haven't considered, many of them religiously motivated (such as the example above or the 30 years war in Germany).  What I find fascinating is how high the old conflicts are, given the weapon technologies they were limited to.
i didn't know muhammad was a pedophile. Muslims should talk about this more often.
Very nicely done.  
I have a better idea... If you're giving a puppy for Christmas, [give something else](http://www.petrescue.com/library/no-pups.htm), for fuck's sake.
Thank you. My favourite part of your compliment is *sometimes*. It shows it's not dumb loyalty.
Great Game!  Over the past couple months, it has gone through several changes and upgrades to meet the request of its users.  I highly recommend this strategy game because it is fun for all ages and easy to learn.  The atmosphere is great for making friends.  Truly interactive!  I give it an A+.
Brisbane, Australia? If so, which roads?
I see no mention of him blaming their acts upon their lack of religion. We should both keep in mind, neither of us has read the full encyclical, so we really do not know the full context of these quotes.
Ron Paul is the greatest liberty bringer of our time. Peace. Freedom. Prosperity. I voted for him in 1988 and I'm very pleased to see what's happening this year. We may not win this year but we are damn sure doing better and we just might be able to keep it going and growing. Please, join us. Go Dr. No!!
White noise coming from a certain direction with a different magnitude than the background radiation would still be a positive result for SETI. Sure, we may not be able to decipher a pattern in it, but we can distinguish it from other, known sources of noise.  Imagine sitting in your back yard listening to the leaves rustle and distant traffic. All of the sudden loud static starts coming from next door. Wouldn't you assume your neighbor is home?
&gt;directors, etc. know enough about the world to  You were wrong before even getting to "libertarianism".
what, no taser?
Just more proof of the creeping insanity of Mr Jobs.
I thought about it for a minute, then I realized Johnny Cash has to be in there too.
Holy shit.  I've said before and I look forward to saying it again:  Go Team Internet!
I found this an interesting read, thanks for sharing it.
HAHAHA ROFLLMAO ... I hope the ranger is okay.
I'm an emigrant. I was born and raised there.
Those AD sucks.
&gt; Well, we'd see more than just one sunspot in the image.  Not necessarily. Different parts of the sun go through phases.
Admiral Ackbar? ITS A TRAP!
....are you zombietime?  Answer in pm if yes :)
you can click it to your hearts content! google doesn't want their contractual partners (REDDIT  - not you) promoting adverse actions against other customers transactions with google.
I thought this was pretty well know already... no?
"The answer to the Fermi Paradox is the mushroom cloud."
You're a dead man.
I'm simply SHOCKED... I had no idea he was still alive.
Upmodded for fatwa potential.
Damn I hate that word "sheeple".
well UK is better in a way since it is in EU and you can move easily within its borders in case sth *bad* happened in the UK  edit: I just want to add that you'll be able to live in the USA but it will be a life bound to comply with the *patriotic* rules. It's like being at the mecy of the governemnt all your life - you can do it but it's a terrible burden.
If it wasn't wrong should the conservatives do the same? Drain ads from democratic candidates?
Even though this is the third time you're repeating the exact same thing without expounding on it, it still sounds as absurd as the first time.  Actually it's pretty ironic. You used arbitrary baseless reasoning to support the assertion that the "hot chicks" theory was arbitrary baseless reasoning. Like the dog chasing it's tail, except the dog realises he's going in circles eventually.
And to say that cruelty and violations of justice are intrinsic to organized religion is just as reprehensible. Mind you, I'm not jumping you specifically, your phrasing was just convenient to play Devil's Advocate with ^_^. 
Yep. Haven't used that phrase since 1992.
who said this was a legal thing?  google isn't going to take you to court for click-fraud.  it isn't fraud in the legal sense, that is just the generally accepted term for abusing CPA ads.   while google may not be able to do anything to you, this could have repercussions for reddit as they use google ads. maybe try to read the thread and understand the issue before mouthing off.
&gt;While I disagree categorizing him as a wackjob  I didn't say this thing that you think you're disagreeing with me about.  &gt;I do agree that the linked article is not a criticism of Paul.  I didn't say this thing that you think you're agreeing with me about.  &gt;If you're looking for an adjective other than wackjob, you might try idealistic or principled.  You might try reading what I wrote.
If that were true, one of the others in our system should also have intelligent life (or be on its way to developing it).
McDonald's salads are pretty unhealthy http://www.pcrm.org/health/reports/fastfood_salads.html  Healthy food, truly healthy food, is, on the whole, more expensive than food backed with artificial preservatives and high fructose corn syrup.
Only ten of The Twelve have been revealed.  We'll find out the other two in the next season.  Damned writers strike.  Oh, wait, wrong drama.
no.  can someone help me out?
they can't and wouldnt do anything to a site that doesnt have a contractual relationship with google
Evel Kinevel took Ron Paul hostage and is waterboarding him at Clinton's NH headquarters?
Carlson is a libertarian with strict views on what defines freedom. Neatly packaging his argument to include social programs, Carlson’s ideology labels popular movements as ‘anti freedom’. According to the libertarian doctrine, universal healthcare, social security, education are all attempts by the federal government to interfere in out lives and force us to give up the freedom to choose what is best for us.
Ah okay. I just misinterpreted the phrase "army drops in with guns blazing" as meaning "army drops in with guns blazing".
Well since you need to sign a contract to get the iPhone, they are still getting plenty of cash whether or not you "take your business elsewhere". The ETF is $175, so that would be the minimum. 
Crucification seems to be part of the zombiefication process.
Reddit = America (the good parts)
I'll take several.
Another kinky conservative.
A more reliable source then http://antwrp.gsfc.nasa.gov/apod/ap060921.html
Whereas a release under the BSD license seems perfectly fine to you. You're playing both sides of the fence. Disliking GPL is fine by me, but claiming that GPL people are evil for "hijacking it" puts the BSD-license people in the same boat.   There's a reason DJB picked "public domain" instead of other licenses - I suggest you see the conference snippet in which he announces the release of (not just qmail, but every previously released, but also new projects) - software. He addresses the available licenses and their shortcomings in that.
Well, does it make sense for virtuous, non-racist people to elect psychos and racists? I don't give a shit if I'm downmoded into oblivion. racist and I are right And I Am Shouting It From the lowest Mountain to the Highest Valley!
I must say, kudos to doing so.  Damn amazing.
Or better yet, slap an ARM chip in there and make it internet-aware. This is, after all, the kind of stuff IPv6 was made for.
Senseless bullshit as opposed to believing that zombies roamed the earth 2000+ years ago?
I've got 3 months... quick, someone call a prostitute!
Still if you want to have a valid conversation you need to look at the current state of things. I feel you're just writing all this stuff to make sure the USA is not viewed as a really bad case, whereas in reality it is. Just try to fathom it and try to make a choice for *your* benefit
&gt;The problem is not that Ron Paul is a whack job, it is that the US is so far from its Constitutional underpinnings that anyone who actually walks the walk is labeled as unstable.  The problem that I am referring to is not that he is a wackjob.  It's that he's commonly perceived as a wackjob.  This perception is a serious problem for Paul, whether you think it's a fair characterization or not.  And articles and titles like this cannot help lessen that perception.
How many "Hard to Fight Cancer" t-shirts can we sell?
I'm voting both up, and I'm doing it for lulz
its not about the end users clicking, its about reddit's (conde nast's) agreements with google not to promote this sort of activity
Lies, terrible lies.  The #1 top religion is of course the Church of the Flying Spaghetti Monster.  He has authorized me to issue a pasta fatwa against the author of the article, the person who posted it, everyone who upmodded it, all those who even thought of upmodding it, everyone who failed to condemn it etc etc
This has to go!
You're a bit late. It's been out for something like three months now.
That's somewhat true, but the problem isn't isolated to the title.  The article itself is a shining example of a Ron Paul supporter who is living up to the stereotype.
Where's your phone now, Huck?
&gt;Must just be an all Texas thread. I posted somewhere else in this page, so if you want to get my view just look me up.  Thank you for showing the courtesy of responding instead of simply clicking down.  First, he did _not_ know this neighbor, and he states so without hesitation in his conversation with the 911 operator.  Now on to your point, even if hypothetically he had known his neighbor well, then he still had no legal right to shoot the criminals.  I don't care whether he felt, "They needed killin," as we're fond of saying in Texas,  You can't deliberately put yourself in the way of harm, so you then have the opportunity to use deadly force, and then claim that you were justified in that act because your life was in jeopardy.  I'm not really interested in debating values with people.  What scares me is that there are a bunch of people here, presumably fellow gun owners, who actually seem to think what he did was legal, not justified mind you, but LEGAL.  It doesn't bode well for the future of lawful gun ownership in this country.  &gt;In that case, I think anyone SHOULD say fuck the law and go for it.  If that's the way you feel then that's fine, but expect to go to prison for it.  The law is the law, we either all live by it, or we risk losing our most basic rights.  Edit: my bad, I misread your post.  If you had a legitimate reason to believe that lives were at risk, then you *might* be legally justified in interfering.  However if you did what this dufus did, and waited until they came out of the neighbor's house, and then ambushed them on the lawn with a shotgun, you should expect to pay the price.
'The very word "secrecy" is repugnant in a free and open society; and we are as a people inherently and historically opposed to secret societies, to secret oaths and to secret proceedings. We decided long ago that the dangers of excessive and unwarranted concealment of pertinent facts far outweighed the dangers which are cited to justify it. Even today, there is little value in opposing the threat of a closed society by imitating its arbitrary restrictions. Even today, there is little value in insuring the survival of our nation if our traditions do not survive with it. And there is very grave danger that an announced need for increased security will be seized upon by those anxious to expand its meaning to the very limits of official censorship and concealment. That I do not intend to permit to the extent that it is in my control.'  - JFK, American Newspaper Publishers Association, 27 April 1961  http://disclose.tv/viewphoto/437/JFK_Secrecy_Speech/
Which of these situations do you think is more deserving of a violent response, if necessary? 1. Teacher allows class to name a teddy bear Mohammed.  2. Teacher is imprisoned and religiously-motivated nutcases form a mob calling for her to be put to death for the supposed "crime" of #1.
Not at all.  I am suggesting (actually, "I" am not, I am merely repeating the arguments of others) that this philosophical distinction between behavior and morality is artificial, and in fact, is a barrier to understanding where morality comes from.  If we accept that many non-human primates have what Marc Hauser has called a "moral grammar," which basically consists of "a set of principles or computations for generating judgments of right and wrong," and that this "grammar" is inherited as an adaptive trait, it is pure academic balderdash to pretend that we're not talking about morality. I think the root of your misunderstanding lies in not familiarizing yourself with the research.  In this context when ethologists say "behavior" they are not talking about something so rudimentary as a moth's instinct to fly towards light. (Actually they are using it to navigate, but that's a different issue)  Instead they are talking about a set of tools or capacities or underlying structures that are very probably the evolutionary equivalent of a code of ethics.  We see it in small children as well, that they innately understand that intention matters in terms of consequences, ie; whether or not something was accidental or deliberate.  What you are really getting at is what Scott Atran (and others) have called "The Third Culture," which in a nutshell has much to do with the trespass of science into territories that the disciplines of philosophy and religion and history etc. have traditionally claimed as their exclusive province. 
And this, ladies and gentlemen, is why context and source is so important. Given this site, then the picture's pretty awesome.
they have no problem spotting this sort of thing
&gt;Now, does this fact, by itself, mean that atheism is bad? No. But consider this next time we say, "Christian leaders are molesting kids and destroying freedom in America, so Christianity is bad." Or "Muslims killed 3000 people in 2001, and so Islam is bad." Because the logic behind all of these claims is essentially the same. This is not a logical statement, due to that fact that those theists actually preach *against* what they're doing and therefore are hypocrites...atheists in general don't preach against anything and really only just disbelieve in what the theists believe, independent of their standpoints against murder/rape/molestation.
If prostitution is rape, that means working as a means to survival is slavery. You glossed over the fact that none of the problems you list can be fixed by criminalizing prostitution. And did you write all this just now or pasted an essay?
For any who remember...  http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/1968_Democratic_National_Convention
&gt; Intentionally clicking on an ad over and over   Disregarding the fact that I disagree with your sentiment, the issue here is mass clicking - not repeat clicking. 
Did someone slip some of that Uranium in my coffee?  I seem to have gone back in time...
interesting. It seems he really mulls things over throughout his later years. Thanks for looking that up.
Pure comedy gold. I am not a Hillary fan, but this was too funny to pass up.  The link is from [Wisco's article](http://politics.reddit.com/info/61u8d/comments/).
As far as I know, it is impossible to ever delete your reddit account. There was a discussion about this when CondeNaste took over Reddit.
thses fkurs prboblyl wnto sotp stih!
I think the real question is: What *does* Huckabee believe?  If he is immovably certain that the earth was litereally created 5,000 years ago, and Eve was made from Adam's rib and all that then yeah -- that's kinda worrisome.   If he just thinks that Darwin's theory of evolution is imperfect, then who cares?  of course the theory is imperfect.  But it's the best, most accurate model we have, that has stood up to rigorous testing over the last 150 years or so. BTW, a [great NOVA program](http://www.pbs.org/wgbh/nova/id/program.html) on Evolution vs. Intelligent Design - I find the issue itself pretty boring but this show was surprisingly entertaining.
Oh man, I drank so much!  Please, tag these photos.  See you next weekend!!!!
Awesome story.   She's catholic AND a women, so much for reddit being full of misogynistic atheists after all.
Yeah, when the repubs get done trashing Hillary (lesbian) or Obama (AlQueida) whitey will win again!  YeeHaw Nascar!  10-4   Goat roper We gotta great big convoy rollin' through the night! 
Any chance someone could explain this? Curious now!
It's absolutely insane. It's like they think God is their toy. They probably admit it in their sermons, "Sometimes, I think God is my toy that I can order around and confuse people with. But he's not."
Actually, taxation is the basis of societal control...  [...the power to tax is the power to destroy](http://www.mises.org/freemarket_detail.aspx?control=546).
Its just not applicable. Breaking stories usually represent a crisis and that type thing gets updated too often. I don't want to see the initial "Breaking News Story" that has little or not facts in the number one slot all day.   I want to see a more complete update to the crisis on the front page.   To keep voting up an initial press release that essentially says " Hostage crisis in NH, details pending" is of no use to me. 
He's a dipshit. He thought I was a Muslim too. Why? My username. It's actually a Middle Eastern Christian last name that means 'Priest'.
Kasporov to D5. Queen takes pawn. Check Putin to C2 Kasporov checkmate 
Again, you're judging then by what we know now. 500 years from now what we know will probably make us look like stone age morons and to them what they know will *be science* and what we know now will be bunk. Get it?
&gt; Tell me exactly what criminal charges I would face for clicking his ads?  Probably none, as there'd not be any evidence to charge you of a crime. However, depending on your motivations, it could technically be fraud:  "All multifarious means which human ingenuity can devise, and which are resorted to by one individual to get an advantage over another by false suggestions or suppression of the truth. It includes all surprises, tricks, cunning or dissembling, and any unfair way which another is cheated."  --Black's Law Dictionary, 5th ed., 1979
Gee, you think? It's a fair bet there's a reason they remain virgins until that age. Full disclosure: 18-year-old virgin offering this opinion. Not by choice, just by a strong tendency to stay indoors.
I honestly just use blogs.  In my case, there are a few designers whose opinions I trust that also happen to run blogs, and since they are not selling ads, I know that I can trust that they are calling it as they see it.
hmm you're right, sorry.  Anyways, i think its pretty obvious, i mean the man has stated that he looks up t fidel, he is bringing cubans and is a couple of days short of being totalitarian.  Here are some links wic you might find interesting if you still belived chavez is the way to go http://blogs.salon.com/0001330/categories/granmalies/  http://blogs.salon.com/0001330/2007/06/06.html#a3524
Do you think Sheeps use Sheople?
&gt;You can't defend Islamic scriptures by bringing up "Christian" atrocities, that's what pussy ass apologists do.  Are those pussy-ass apologists, or pussy ass-apologists? I can never tell...
hows your mutilated penis?
Uhh.... throw it in the fire maybe?
&gt; Phyllis Schlafly and other religious conservatives issued a press release denouncing Warren's decision to invite the pro-choice Obama and asserting, "If Senator Obama cannot defend the most helpless citizens in our country, he has nothing to say to the AIDS crisis. You cannot fight one evil while justifying another."
aluminum is also a toxic metal.  so is zinc.  uranium ore is primarily U238, not its fissible counterpart U235.  you are at very little risk of uranium poising if you don't eat the ore.  the bottom line is, you're more likely to get poisoned by an exploding CFL than by a rock of uranium ore.
Yes, boys are pigs and girls are sugar and spice. Blah blah blah.
It needs constant repeating, something like "This is your mind on rigged politics". 
&gt; bad programmers tend not to mind working on bad code  I think this should be changed to   &gt; bad programmers tend not to recognize bad code  No one likes to work with substandard code, right?  So it would be a Good Thing to stay informed of proven programming techniques and patterns.  And perhaps avoid companies with high turnover.
Nobody expects the Spanish Inquisition!
I'm not arguing that we have much to learn.  We won't look like stone age morons, we will look like morons from the beginning of the scientific era. You don't seem to appreciate the drastic change brought about by that shift in thinking.
haha ... sarcasm FTW.
yay! faithfreedom.. those were the good old days of trolling.
I've never wanted to bitch slap anyone more in my life than her and I am not prone to violence.
Fox News tells the truth about something?  That *is* news.
WTF? a comment calling the post brilliant gets +4 and the post itself is at 0?
Serious question: do you have problems with the sexism on reddit ?
I didn't say it was a law, I was answering your question where you asked how it was FRAUD.
What happens to the money if he doesn't get selected; does he get to keep it?
I shat in your mother's mouth.
I donated for my 3rd time today Ron, and I will donate again on December 16th!!! Go Ron!
Drivelization of comedy, is what found. 
&gt; ...his argument makes it implicit that he believes that the mechanisms by which the police are monitored are effective...  In that case I don't argue, although I'd rather see replies to illustrate that than blind downmodding...  &gt; Police are effectively a gang, you cannot trust them to police their own members.  Except in the (rare?) occasions where oversight committees consist of civilians?
Go nuts RG just stay the hell away from me!
I wish the MSM would give me a sense of the economic and racial configuration of Atlanta so I can decide if they are black and poor enough to deserve it.
other albums on the site are worth checking out, but none are as comprehensive and singularly focused as 'the party.' and i was thinking the same thing, for the most part they are in really good shape.  but this appears to be a young, modern and kind of hip group for the time period, thus more likely to be physically fit.
I've heard a few reports of people pulling fingers out of their McDonald's pies...
Turbot Street and Wickham Street. Absolutely sucks during peak hour, traffic is so slow that  the intersection never clears.  I always have to take the far right lane merging into Wickham Street too, so I have to drive pretty much diagonally across four lanes :)
These so-called 'dogmas' are not unquestionable, and indeed [*have been*](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Thomas_Kuhn#The_Structure_of_Scientific_Revolutions_.281962.29) questioned.  Maybe if you were to actually question them (rather than just mentioning that they could potentially be questioned), I could tell you what I think of your arguments, and decide whether or not I ought to continue to rely upon empirical evidence or meet claims with a healthy degree of skepticism.  When people criticize religion for being dogmatic, they don't mean to imply that religion begins with certain premises and uses those premises to establish conclusions - *everybody* does that.  Rather, they mean to imply that religion continues to believe unquestioningly in those premises even after considerable evidence has been brought to bear against them.  Or, more to the point, that they do not feel any pressing need to support their beliefs in the face of opposition *at all.*  It's doesn't do any good to claim that the scientific method is like the dogma of religion without saying *why* the scientific method is a bad one.  Philosophers of Science, by the way, have given such arguments, and scientific methodology has changed once its former premises were sufficiently undermined.  Look up [Karl Popper](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Karl_Popper#Philosophy_of_Science) if you want to see how science is willing to accept valid criticism. I emphasize:  *valid.*  It is not a *valid* critique of any well-argued position to take note of the fact that it proceeds from certain premises - or to then try to use this to support the idea that *any* and *all* premises are on a par, and represent perfectly good starting grounds.  Is your idea that so long as one takes *anything* for granted, one is irrational?  That the man who assumes the sun will rise tomorrow and thus argues that he will be able to see the road better in the morning is **no different** from the man who assumes that there is a dragon living in the garage and thus argues that he can never leave his house? This seems a bit crazy to me, and I hope that it does to you as well.  The problem you are raising, by the way, was first invoked in a religious context by American protestants at the turn of the last century who felt increasingly burdened to align themselves with science, and increasingly dismayed that they were unable to do so.  They were ultimately only able to square faith with science by bringing in an ancient argument for skepticism (known as the Pyrrhonian problematic), which argues that, because all knowledge must proceed from premises in order to be justified, and that these premises must *also* be justified, by further premises - that, therefore, we were faced with an infinite regress, and therefore, no premises could be justified, and thus, we are never justified in believing anything.  Of course, the protestants did not want to argue for skepticism.  Rather, they simply wanted to remove themselves from the 'reasons game,' to sidestep the question of justification altogether.  You can read about this in a book by William Warren Bartley called [*The Retreat to Commitment*](http://www.amazon.com/Retreat-Commitment-William-Warren-Bartley/dp/081269127X)  Anyhow, if you're interested, there are [other ways](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Coherentism#The_regress_argument) of dealing with the Pyrrhonian problematic than simply placing all rational starting points on a par.
What about.... 01100001111000101011110110
I can has lois lane?
Very clever.  I am aware of the connection, believe it or not; the points of divergence seem to exert more influence than the point of convergence, however.
You know what, things like this will keep me reading Reddit for many more years.
*at the helm of the Best Buy store*  Prepare for Metamorphosis! Ready Kafka?
Maybe we should have the government tell us when to loose our virginity -- A Deflowering Age -- like the drinking age.
"Ron Paul Blimp -- Is this the coolest grass-roots driven Presidential campaign ever?" No.
no, I'm writing all this stuff because everybody focuses on one small period of time in the US. They have no idea of the historical context of the things Bush is doing, this is nothing new to us, and nothing new to the rest of the world.  I think the US has plenty of stuff wrong with it. Most of which is not Bush's fault, but the fault of the people who live here.    You are the one that brought Europe into it. Comparing the two is irrelevant, since Europe has a very short history of civil liberties. Perhaps you should compare the US to Sudan, or China. But no, that never happens because then it invalidates your argument that the US is a very bad place to live. 
It has only stood up to rigorous testing on microscales without complex biochemistry.  Adaptation has been observed on a macroscale, but adaptation is not evolution.  But, I'll go ahead and say it:  SILENCE, d42!  Reddit has spoken and evolution is infallible!  HEAR YE!  INFALLIBLE!
Ah, you're assuming those two sets are not identical. :)
&gt; ..."call 9/11"  Good advice. I'd just like to bring attention to your Freudian slip in there.
Us atheists actually take all your holy books at face value.   When your holy book says that god created a man and a woman 6,000 years ago we know that is not correct and therefore your religion is likely bunk.  When we read that your god-man rose from the dead just like pagan Osiris, Dionysus, Horus, Mithra and countless others we assume it was a myth.  Likewise when we read that your prophet raped a nine year old child there is no good excuse for that passage to be there. If your apologetics were true then the passage would have mentioned that the marriage was "only officially consummated" or that the prophet refuted the story to his followers. As it stands right now all those hadiths confirm that Muhammad was a pedophile regardless of the amount of spin you throw at us.   We atheists don't discriminate on the basis of religion. We treat all your holy books as equally despicable as any one who objectively reads them must do so. We just let those texts speak for themselves because we have no emotional investment in them. Anything wrong with that?
And to think hucka rhymes with _ucka, there's an irony in there somewhere. 
&gt; I also wonder whether these individuals experiencing arousal issues are choosing the wrong sexual orientation. All available research (actual research, not that "ex-gay" crap) indicates that sexual orientation is not chosen. You can choose to act contrary to your orientation, but it probably won't work out very well.
The NWO is no secret. It's publicly announced regularly.. you just need to open your single pyramid eye. http://news.bbc.co.uk/1/hi/uk_politics/6277747.stm
Not to the states, but to a dickhead. 
the state of evolutionary biology is arguably about as good as that of the standard model of particle physics, which doesn't explain everything either.  so, i guess you don't believe in quarks.  
Take a look at your average Mexican and then your average American. I think it's fair to assume that far more inter-breeding went on in Mexico than slaughter when compared to America.
"History has proven wrong ideologies such as Marxism which say humans had to establish social justice because God did not exist, the Pope wrote.  "It is no accident that this idea has led to the greatest forms of cruelty and violations of justice," the Pope said. Such a concept was grounded in "intrinsic falsity"."
Now I have to buy some.
&gt; But Howard Grubb, an applied statistician at the University of Reading, notes that, "with a sample of only 250, anything between 43.8 per cent and 56.2 per cent on one side or the other cannot be said to be biased".  Are they kidding?  this is a news article with an insignificant sample...in which getting more data is *trivial*?
Indeed. Never judge a community based on a few of its members, no matter how vocal they may be.
&gt;How doomed can one state be? The answer is none. None more doomed.  Judging by writing ability, it seems like this person was Texas educated...
[Interesting guy](http://www.fosters.com/apps/pbcs.dll/article?AID=/20070316/FOSTERS01/103160230).
I'd rather have a greasemonkey script than a full-blown extension.
It's true what they say: White people can't dance.
"An American lawyer, Catherine MacKinnon, recently proposed a definition that distinguished pornography from erotica. Pornography, she suggests, portrays women being physically abused, in subordinate roles to men or dehumanised as sexual objects. Erotica, by contrast, shows men and women in equal power relationships that are based on emotional attachment."  Well that's got to be the biggest of load of horseshit ever - how dare she "propose a definition" to satisfy her lesbo/feminist agenda but which bears no relation to reality?  Erotica is essentially creative: literature or art that invokes sexual feelings in the beholder. Pornography is depictive: the graphic/photographic depiction of sexual acts, which may or may not be arousing. Both can involve violence, humiliation (or any paraphilia that floats your boat) but for the most part, both are benign, normal and healthy. 
Upmodded for gonads of steel.
Ah, so *that's* where they went!
They aren't just "Google" ads.  I recently tested out Yahoo! Search Marketing and found that they have many "partner" sites the hard way.  My ads ended up on those "partner" sites and there really isn't a good way to stop it from happening.  It seems the domainers are good friends with Yahoo! for this reason. I called to complain about the money I was losing (the clicks from those ads didn't seem to convert the way ones in Yahoo! search results did) and I was told I could only block one "parnter" domain at a time, and it would take up to 3 days for the block to work.  It's an effectively useless tool, where AdWords and AdCenter both seem to allow complete blocking.   Of course, the Reddit-spaming linkjackers do seem to prefer Google. :-)
History is against Mitt. For only 8 per cent of the past century has there been a president with a 'y' in his name (1961-1969: John Kennedy, Lyndon Johnson). And for only three per cent if you take surnames. Furthermore he should consider himelf lucky if he doesn't get the job. The last two presidents whose names ended in 'y' were assassinated in office. Either way it ain't good.
I can pull McDonald's pies out of my fingers.
What a dumb site. Why is all the text graphics? Regarding content: the Christianity section was so simplified as to be meaningless and completely misleading.
Hey you tricked me!
That's normal for a plush bear. Or, are you talking about bomb-head guy?
I think that's a main reason why people download games... I paid for the orange box because I KNEW it would be good. Proven track record from valve.   I've downloaded games and then bought them, after the download, because they were so good. But I'm not really in a situation where I can drop $50 "just to see" if a PC game is good.
You should question your assumptions of what people who are anti-war believe. I don't blame American soldiers for the corruption of the government. They don't get to make policy.  The fact that they are giving more money to Ron Paul speaks to their intelligence. That means they see past the Sean Hannity, O'Reilly, and other propagandists bullshit.
An interesting idea, but jeez, I kind of want that right-winger in jail.
That's my point exactly.  If you are biologically a homosexual, but you decide to find (i.e. choose) a heterosexual partner, you might end up having arousal issues when in bed with your significant other.
Upmodded, FTW
I wish I could remember the name of the documentary, but there was a young man with epilepsy featured.  He has seizures in the "religious" part of the brain.  These seizures cause him to see everything as connected, and felt love for everything... a short circuit between familiarity and vision.  He would talk about love and connectedness and deep meaning after the attacks. Doesn't sound like most religious folks, but certainly sounds like the prophets.  Edit: The documentary featured Ramachandran and others talking about weird brain injuries and diseases. I think it's this Nova episode: http://query.nytimes.com/gst/fullpage.html?res=9C06E2D61F3EF930A15753C1A9679C8B63&amp;n=Top/Reference/Times%20Topics/People/W/Wertheimer,%20Ron
You left out 2006. But 2000,2004 will repeat if Hillary makes it past primaries.
and I want to stay home and bake cookies.
I always wondered how he broke those tiny bones in the ear?
That's why I like being Catholic, we're a bunch of gay pedophiles.
exactly the lines I was thinking. Someones linked reference suggested a 1% liability to personal finances, so it seems that nobody thinks the full weight of responsibility should go to the investor. Don't you think there should be some form of encouragement by the government for investment?   As utopian as it sounds to allow everyone to be an investor, I think there has to be some reward afforded those that risk. Without risk there can be no advancement. I suppose this isn't really "free market" then and I usually think government involvement is detrimental. Its a hard position for me to resolve theoretically.
And it would be funny if this time he made it!
I can never remember--are you Bevis or Butthead?
Well, it's a skycycle actually, honey. It's not a bike. A skycycle. There are only two skycycles in the whole world and I own them both. I had three, but the third one is in the bottom of the Snake River Canyon.
I'm a guy and I've had one of those down there!   Do.. do you still want to know about it?
http://img99.imageshack.us/img99/6679/oppressedkv6sp0.gif
I was responding more to the sensationalist headline of "Does pornography lead to sexual violence?" I think the clear answer to that is "No, it doesn't. Not by a long shot."
That's the thing.  When so many people accept these warted theories as fact and then make fun of religion, it's awfully hypocritical.  We are human.  We have no perfect answers.  We're all making guesses based on observations.  Some people agree on one answer.  Others agree on another answer.  It's pitifully stupid for either group to attack the other because of this.
Infuriating even the most rabid of Dawkins' supporters to this point requires weaponized acts of cognitive dissonance and irrationality. Trolling, in other words.  http://420.thrashbarg.net/hadawkin.jpg
Where would capitalism be without exploitation?
Unless you were born via c-section, you probably rubbed against your mom's snatch during birth. 
No, the iPod Touch doesn't include the Mail app and requires Wi-Fi; it won't work with mobile networks like the iPhone will.
Do that with your prius, hemp fags.
don't be sorry. 'cause *exactly that* does make him a perfect candidate to win the elections.
Is it any less than what they did to Bill Clinton when he was President? No.
Awesome title! Hilarious!!! Too bad the article ends up with a plug for bigger more expensive radio telescopes. Who's going to pay for them?
Wow, thanks for catching that heinous misspelling!  Luckily you were able to infer what I was talking about. I don't give a shit if it's lisP, LiSp or lIsP.
Call 'em and ask. :)
That sucks
&gt;SILENCE, d42! Reddit has spoken and evolution is infallible! HEAR YE! INFALLIBLE!  Ha ha! I envision Reddit in a tri-corn cap with a large hand bell, clanging away as you watch your argument get anonymously modded down -- "INFALLIBLE!!" :)
Back in mah day...
&gt; All he had to do was claim consummation. Is it more likely he penetrated a girl before the age of menses?  Sure, why not?  Culturally things were different then.  Also see the (contemporary) [Child Brides of Afghanistan](http://www.npr.org/templates/story/story.php?storyId=5541006).
Ouch. Forgot about that. Fucking Apple.
"Unlimited" == "More than your neighbor, less than you expect."
Except that the god of Islam claims responsibility for all the major atrocities of the Pentitude (global flood, Abraham's and David's wars etc).
Time to logout and take your medication
Can you hear me now?
Groovy, or possibly Fab.  I can´t quite tell from the pictures.
was it that obvious?
If x-ians weren't such fucking assholes, they wouldn't be persecuted as much. Lolz.
[BEAT THAT, GUILIANI.](http://puzzle.arpatubes.net/)
I know right??  speakers!!! Ridiculous!  Who the hell enjoys music more than money?  Amirite reddit?
Down Vote. I'm not going to give publicity to a company who tried to destroy the spirit of gaming.
See? This is the reddit I know and love.
&gt; If the "ticking time-bomb" is truly the justification that supporters of torture claim it to be, then let's write that into law: [...]  I'd look at it (edit: ie. present the argument to a torture-supporter) a different way - it's already written into law. Ticking time-bomb? Sure, you can go ahead and torture for "information", you just have to know that regardless of the result you're going to go to lose your job and your pension and go to jail for years (and what the hell, if you're in the UK, put on a sex offenders register) for it. No exceptions.  But you'd have saved MILYUNS AND MILYUNS OF PEOPULS LIVES, so for you it'd be worth it.  ...right? :)
The cover-Clinton-Inc's-ass campaign begins.  Anything to take the attention away from her complete incompetence and complete lack of likability.  That's good, because we need her to be the Demagogue nominee before she implodes.
Points to the baha guy for trying. 
Thank you good samaritan. You're a good person for thinking of someone else first.  I really hope your insurance company doesn't show you how much they appreciate your selfless act by raising your rates.
Best thing about that toy, it didn't seem to have any limit.  They put saftey limiters on stuff now
I agree to the extent that it hurts creditors, but not society as a whole. The question is do you punish the creditor or the businessman for the risk? Both are a form of businessman after all.
So passive activism does work! Excuse me boys while I recline my chair and watch Fox News.
I'd love it if people could separate Judaism and Israel.  I'm fine with the religion ... it's the state that I'm not too keen on. I don't care what religion they are.
When news breaks...we fix it!
&lt;/fraud&gt; *&lt;/click&gt;* Jeez you guys
&gt;I was pulled into the Lost Prevention office  So does that mean Worst Buy won't be carrying any more reality TV? Yay!
apottedficus, You obviously have not examined the entire manuscript.  I am at work currently and will get back to you later with the location of the armadillo.  But in the mean time I am thrilled to learn you have determined it is OBVIOUSLY European.  Do you care to share with us how you know this?
From the first three paragraphs of the site you linked to:  &gt; Muhammad (peace be upon him). Praise be to Allah alone  &gt; display to the world that Prophet Muhammad (peace be upon him)   &gt; the pure character of Prophet Muhammad (pbuh)  &gt; through the Guidance of Allah (SWT)
What do you suggest? That's the way it's supposed to work.
I thought that said:  "America is addicted to Reddit, they think its free Funny"
I think we've got to be looking out for Huckabee at this point and taking him more seriously than Giuliani. Huckabee's gained a lot of steam in recent months, while all kinds of stuff is coming out about Rudy.  I think Huckabee's a nice guy, but I don't think I want him leading the country in this age.
I'm familiar with the research, - unfortunately those doing it are better scientists than they are philosophers.  Perhaps if you were more familiar with philosophy, you would be able to understand the point.  To simplify something G.E. Moore said:  No matter what natural fact you might point to (e.g. human behavioral tendencies), it cannot  be identical with a moral fact because you can always *coherently* ask whether that natural fact is 'morally good' or not.  Establishing that humans or nonhuman animals have certain behavioral tendencies tells us nothing about 'right' and 'wrong' - but only about what they are inclined to do or not do.
Dr. Len Lictepeen If you can get past that and still think this was a real article, you deserve whatever you get.
This would be a good tag line to put on any Ebay auctions you post... **We are always in compliance with Section 13 from part 40 of the NRC Nuclear Regulatory Commission rules and regulations and Postal Service regulations specified in 49 CFR 173.421 for activity limits of low level radioactive materials. Item will be shipped in accordance with Postal Service activity limits specified in Publication 52. **
I'm deaf.  This pisses me off.  AT&amp;T will never get my business now.
Too bad it isn't:   Daredevil Evel Knievel died of 69.
&gt; Use plain text and MD5 and published the overview structure of the document but not the actual contents, I doubt it will be possible to generate MD5 collision for that.  The problem with that is that is if the content you're trying to protect is something simple from among a small set of options, like presidential candidates. Someone can just try "Ron Paul", "Rudy Guiliani", etc. until they find the one that matches your hash. You *could* add extraneous information to the content, like a long string of text or PDF formatting, but then that's vulnerable to a planned collision.
Except that's not what I said at all. Ratzinger was a Hitler Youth, and he has never really repudiated that experience from his childhood.  But, as many others have pointed out, the Pope has skeletons in his closet from his ADULTHOOD, specifically his instrumental work in covering up the Catholic sex abuse scandal.  I do not like the Pope. I believe that every adult who willingly follows him willingly follows ignorance, bigotry, and hatred.  We are talking about an institution that once executed people for advocating that the Earth revolves around the sun; I submit that the Catholic church is little better today: it just has better PR.  Are you Catholic? Do you enjoying ignoring the mounds of scientific evidence that demonstrates homosexuality isn't a choice? Do you support the Pope in his desire to strip me of the Civil Union my partner and I share?
&gt; Over the past two years they've enjoyed an upsurge in funding from governments, the Pentagon, big oil companies, utilities and venture capital firms.  &gt; and an Energy Department lab announced in late October that it was partnering with Chevron Corp., the second-largest U.S. oil company, in the hunt for better strains of algae.  I will BET you that they are investing in it so they can patent it and then *squash it* for another 20 years while we keep using fossil fuels.
I call BS on this. It's a publicity stunt.
To say they conquered them is to give them too much credit I feel. 
Well, you're not.
People partied in the 60's?  Who knew.
I call BS on this. He's faking.
I call BS on this. There's no proof google contacted reddit.
Americans are much fatter than starving concentration camp victims.  It'll work.
same God, different prophets, in fact, in the endtimes the Koran says that Jesus will participate in the final battle.  So, that's kinda irrelevant.
I am willing to pay the price to stop importing oil all together.   Are you?
Or, Ron Popeil's Pocket Fissionman. Wow, that was bad.  I'm downmodding it myself.
I remember my dad hacked an old broken laptop of his into a Projector, he used an overhead projector for the lightsource, used the LCD screen, and built an enclosure for the whole thing- I don't think it was the MB that died- but I don't remember, I'm surethere are intrustions on the web somewhere. Fairly cheap, he got the overhead-projector from the recycle center.  Speaking of Recycling centers, they're quite often chock full of good toys, old computers, old tvs, old tvs with giant fresnel lenses on the front -- aka a giant magnifying glass. 1 sq meter of sunlight focused to the space of a quarter produces approximately 1 kilowatt of energy, in the form of heat and light. We got a 40" front end of a big screen tv, sets rubber on fire in about 2 seconds, makes a satisfing "whoosh." Melts small copper  objects to. Not pennys, as that would constitute mutilation of federal property.  *wink wink, nudge nudge*
But we didn't get his brains.  His sweet, sweet brains.
I call BS on this. Instead of uranium package contains a bobcat.
&gt;but it can't be much if it is shippable by USPS  If it's properly labeled, packaged, shielded and weighs under 70lbs then USPS will carry nearly anything.
That's like the judge in Saudi Arabia that just had that woman jailed for being a rape victim.
lest it was a good number to die at, always a lucky bastard.
Dawkins' quote has nothing to do with Zionism.
There's a difference between accuracy and precision.  Dawkins proposes to measure the *precision* of the judges vs. juries, which is to say, their *consistency*.  But *accuracy* requires a target, a "true" value against which the measurements can compare.  What is that true value?  Presumably, in a democracy, it is the verdict supported by the majority of the population.  In this formulation, the judges (having been "brainwashed" by their education) would probably be *precise* but not *accurate*, whereas the jury would probably *accurate* but not *precise*.  Interestingly, the Athenian jury system was both precise *and* accurate, since there were 500 jurors and their decisions were independent (by law).  (Oh yeah, the jurors were selected randomly at the last minute, too.)  Side note: does rediquette say anything about responding in months old threads?
No, because tetris was invented in Russia, and we haven't invaded them yet.
I call BS on this. How do we know the figures are true?
Or you could do [this](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=HIXEzj08MwE&amp;feature=related)
If all the plain text document contains is the name of the candidate, then it would be trivial for someone else to try all the names of the candidates and find which one matches the hash. You could add extra text, but since no one can know what that text is ahead of time, you could theoretically play with that text to create a planned collision just the same as they used the structure of PDF to do here.
not to mention ritual cannabalism.
COBALT is the keyword that is bringing that into play.
cool but the voice of the videos is extremely annoying, please give that guy some air
I call BS on this. Reddit never helped anyone.
I always knew hershey's supported the people's war on drug wars!  Munnnchiies
Eye-tracking studies of web users seem to be showing that users very quickly learn how to "not see" obvious ads.  For example their eyes might get right to the edge of an ad and then suddenly look elsewhere.  I've seen usability warnings to web designers that if they get too fancy with fonts and colors their actual site content can end up categorized as an ad in user's peripheral vision, and end up being effectively invisible.
The Irish weren't too nice to the Blacks either.  http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/New_York_Draft_Riots
I call BS on this. No way was he that stupid.
yes, but I think this is an african thing, not muslim.
I tried to make a similar argument to my wife about why I had to get the five-*hundred*-dollar hooker.  She thinks it's stupid and I should just cross the border and get it for five bucks.  If I don't then she's threatened to make it up in our weekly budget by going to one-ply toilet paper and a breakfast cereal the whole family will love... *except* me.
I'm male. And stating the obvious. I probably would have done it myself.
your social norms don't apply to people in other times.
and stuff? what else would be relevant in this thread?
It is the [HPV-virus at play again](http://www.webmd.com/sexual-conditions/hpv-genital-warts/news/20070509/hpv-linked-to-throat-cancer) and getting the HPV-vaccine against cervical cancer will protect both sexes against some forms of throat cancer too.
FTA: http://www.faithfreedom.org/Gallery/mo-aisha.gif
I've been playing Wave Race on the Wii virtual console just recently. It isn't so much about how the water looks (in a static screen shot), as how it acts. Really works.
Don't forget that the Victorians also screwed up the English language! I hate you Victorians and your 'rain in Spain' rhyming with 'reign in feign' and your exaggerated pronunciation which warped the language, confusing many letters, vowels, misusing the letter 'g' and ng/gn and many other sounds. All in a fruitful effort to convince Victorian women to act in Victorian porn. 
someone want to set up a reddit ron paul fund at fundable.com? (The same thing that helped this lady)
The last true Christian died on the cross.
Actually, according to TFA, he only broke about 40.
Yes, your soul.
We did the same stupid shit our parents did, and our kids will do the same stupid shit we do.
Why?  What's wrong with having a nice sound system in a shitty car?  If you really like music isn't this how you should be spending your money?
&gt; As the GOP debate in Iowa clearly illustrates, absolutely nobody is about to offend the corn industry.  That's just until they get safely out of Iowa.  Nobody wants to get cornholed.  Oh wait... you said it was the Republicans.
See those damned atheists are trying to make us look stupid!
That's the point.
Read the article before commenting. It helps you avoid looking dumb.  In the article, the author states that for every 2% increase in pornography, there was a 1% increase in rape.   The above table, along with other data I've seen, appears to debunk this.
Nice one, Wang Banger
Awesome! Although I wasn't one of the people who contributed, it's really cool to know that it's not always just about armchair philosophizing and LOLcats, important as those topics may be. 
The difference: Crack cocaine does not give you minty fresh breath.
I believe it should be "Today, the Freedom Blimp rises above $10,000,000"
As the dollars build up in the 2008 presidential election, it has become clearer that the race is really over for the majority of the candidates. Hilary Clinton, Barack Obama, and John Edwards are the only Democrats left with a real chance, and Edwards is only surviving by the skin of his teeth.
So...what's the vehicular homicide covering up, then?
&gt; things people would rather have than money.  I knew somebody would say this.  You are implying that they are poor, or are "bad" at choosing what to spend money on.  (Based on your own standards, of course)  Let me ask you this: what makes you think they are poor?  The neighborhood looks nice and well kept.  There are new cars parked in the driveway.  They are well dressed.  Judging from their neighborhood in Queens their parents are probably hard working immigrants.  These people are living the American dream, and here you are making fun of them.  Oh, I know what it must have been.  Their skin is brown.  So since they're not white people buying a home theatre system, they're throwing their money away.  God damn niggers should get off of welfare, right?!?!  Hobbyists drive trends in everything.  Computers, cars, electronics, EVERYTHING.  What is fringe today will be mainstream in 5 years.  This drives markets and capital investment.  It even said in the god damned photo shoot that these people finance their purchases through contract installation work.  You are witnessing american entrepreneurialism, except you don't realize it because you're an ignorant fool.  It's a good god damned thing there are people like this out there making the world an interesting place.  I'd hate to live in a world filled with boring assholes like yourself.
Eh, I am not sure if that could be called procedural textures.  http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Procedural_textures  It sounds like they simply had two textures and would change to the high resolution version close up.  Nothing about generating the graphics from an algorithm on the fly.
Where do I sign up
&gt; The repellent nature of sex with prepubescents is cross-cultural.  Historically it's extremely common.  It's only relatively recently that we've taken up such a protective view of children.  I wouldn't be surprised if only nailing ONE 9-year-old was extremely progressive for the time.
google doesnt need to do anything, anyone can photograph anyone outdoors for any reason without even asking for permission. if you dont want to be photographed strolling out of the smut tavern, well, dont go in there.  but if the big G wants to be nice...
Are you serious?  So anything that predates "modern science" must be true and doesn't need to be proven in any way?  I did not "attack chi" for not being scientific. I asked you to show me repeatable, testable experiments that show, in any way, that something called "chi" exists as anything other than a concept. I can show you experiments for gravity.  *Edit* I mis-read your original post, although I really don't get your point.  Are you saying that chi is now subject to scientific rigor? If so, I don't even know why you bothered saying anything at all: the post I replied to said that since I couldn't "show" him a graviton that this in some way validated the possible existence of chi.
what kind of idiot put this page together?   I mean, it's all TEXT.  Good luck getting the search engines to index this!
Where is CaptainObvious?
I call BS on this. He's not really a Native American at all!
OMG  (I have images blocked, so I didn't see it originally)
Hopefully it will go to re-claiming the Republican party from the Neo-cons.  I've begun to get involved in my local party.
There is no doubt you would be traumatized but not to the same extent the average woman is. You would probably still be able to function at home and work. You also probably wouldn't from any sort of sexual dysfunction. 
Yeah, a victory worthy of Pyrrhus.
Islam is currently 300 years younger than Christianity was when they were burning witches.  In any event, my point was that maybe instead of focusing on the religion we could focus on the people? Every time someone pulls the "Islam is the religion of peace" crap or tries to differentiate Islam and Christianity they're missing the problem.  
I'm sure the marketing dept. at Hershey's buy crack on a regular basis so they don't have things like this happen.
Also male, and would have respected the privacy of a customer/client.
&gt;This (and many other reasons) is why it remains a theory and not a law.  SCIENCE DOES NOT WORK THAT WAY!  &amp;lt;/Morbo&gt;
I know how we'll stop those fuckers from committing suicide... let's kill 'em!
Rudy, is that you?
If you're talking about the AFPL, they stopped using that in June 2006.
up-voted in honor of Ron Burgundy.
What's really stupid is thinking someone else's hobby is stupid.
I agree that MD5 is dead, or at least dying, but isn't it a bit unfair to modify *both* files to produce a collision? It seems like it would have better impact if a reasonably short suffix were added only to the "goodbye" example, since this would more closely represent an attempt to masquerade a malicious file as a legitimate one.
Hey lets blame Jay Leno for this it's all his fault the writers are striking....hey wait a minute....Lametards...
dear foldl, you missed the point by 1000 miles.  rudy is a potential presidential candidate (with many supporters who believe in his shit) for the most powerful nation on earth and is knowingly using (these) statistics to win the 2008 elections. many lives depend on the next elections. maybe not in your neighbourhood but surely for a lot of people in the middle east.
&gt;important as those topics may be  You have no idea
Holy crap, the sun is way bigger than that space station!
&gt;I never even attempted to refute it.  Yes you did. You claim *now* that you were not talking about the right wingers who killed children and civil rights workers. ou claim *now* that you were responding to a claim that I allegedly made, that no Democrats are racist. But: 1. I never made such a claim. 2. racism didn't even enter the discussion till *after* I brought up the right wing murders. 3. You quoted what I said about the murders, then said baloney in response. So you couldn't possibly have been responding to anything I said about racism.  Your "baloney" statement was about the civil rights' and children's deaths. Nothing more, nothing less. Seriously, dude, anyone can read the thread and see that you're lying. What do you get out of it? &gt;In the 1960s, the Democrats were against civil rights. Learn history. &gt;They were. Learn the real history, not the SBC apologetics: In the 1960's the Democrats *proposed and voted in Civil Rights legislation over the objections of Republicans and what would become the religious right.* &gt;And this shows how utterly biased and hateful you are. You accuse Malkin and Limbaugh of "hostility to ethnic and religious minorities." The fact that you don't see anything wrong about these folks and their positions towards minorities says more about you than you realise. It's really no different from your claims that Trent Lott *meant* something other than race when he was wishing aloud for a segregationist president or your spurious claims about the murders of the civil rights workers. &gt;You have warped my words, never answered my questions Bull. You asked me to "name" a right winger speaker who had spoken on a college campus in the last 5 years without being physically attacked---falsely implying that it would be hard to name such a person--and when I answered your question, you simply pretended not to hear, since my factual answer didn't confirm your prejudices. &gt;It is honestly people like you that destroy any hope for bipartisanship or rational discussion in this country. People like me, who think that the people to blame for bombing black churches are the people who did it, and not the people who protested it. What awful monsters we are. Incidentially, your repeated use of the "honestly" is a tell--in order words, a dead giveaway that even you don't believe what you're saying. &gt;the very idea that you walk into the conversation with pre-conceived notions so warped that they color everything you read  This, from the person who imagined that I said no Democrats were racist. The person who imagines that right wing speakers can't speak on a college campus without being physically attacked. I'm sorry if you were homeschooled and listen to Fox 24/7 and have never realised that Rush and Malkin aren't telling you the whole story--or whatever it is that has you so hostile to non-Republicans you've gone to the lengths you've gone to, to exonerate Republicans for their behavior, and demonize non-Republicans. But whatever it was, it still doesn't excuse you lying about things that happened on this thread. Incidentally, you complain of personal attacks, but *read the thread, buppie*--you started them. I hadn't said anything to you personally, when you came up with the claim that it was "scary" that I thought civil rights workers had been murdered by the right wing. Then you attacked me again, claiming that if I didn't accept your political views, I must be "insecure" in my faith. Those pre-dated anything I said to you that could remotely be construed as a personal attack. It may interest you to know that being a Republican doesn't give you a God-given right to direct *ad hominems* at others and not get them in return. No matter how superior Rush, Michelle, and Ann tell you that you are, they're wrong.
...now the only problem is prying it from the hands of php developers
&gt;Remember, we are not looking just for intelligent life here, but for intelligent beings that care about technology  time to add another parameter to the drake equation.
"We cannot target a given hash value, and produce a (meaningful) input bit string hashing to that given value."
I don't think it was fundable that helped, two families donated both her trip and the trip for her friend.  From the article, it sounds like McKan declined the money from fundable.com after receiving the other two donations.
Free breast cancer treatment at my house!
For every one who went into uniform to get tail (subconsciously or consciously) there's one like me who would have went in and didn't.  In my promiscuous days, I was able to get all those boys in uniform without having to wear one myself, after all :)
That's nice to see. The lady deserves to take her vacation. Good on everybody who offered help.
in some places a good way to get sued.
Here's the fundamental issue with "Public Domain" and GPL:  With public domain you are free to use the code for commercial applications with out either having to recognize the author/project or make your modifications/implementation public.  With the GPL, you can use for profit, but you must share.  People seem to forget the entire idea behind the GPL is to improve software by sharing the code with a much larger community of developers without the fear of legal retribution.  Public domain release does not accomplish this critical goal.  The GPL is a software improvement process more than it is a legal framework for licensing software.  Either you get that, or you're forever lost in the woods.  And yes, as soon as a project is released to the public domain, the smartest thing to do is put it in a GPL wrapper from which all further development should proceed.  Now, questions is: will current and future patch submitters recognize the wisdom of this move?  Releasing to public domain was just the original author's way of sending a big old "fsck you" to the GPL community (his dislike of GPL is widely known/openly stated and the reason why he eventually had to let go).  Postfix kicked qmails ass quite some time ago, but I really don't want to digress into the gory details of why and how that happened (but, yes, to some degree, it directly relates to how each project decided to license their software)
I hope readership for the site gets a bump from the article.  We need more Ron Paul bots! ;)
It was just a joke, silly. (Not a very good one, but there's no need to get so worked up about it.)
OLD  I read this on the frontpage back in 1328.
The guy compared women to a tasty morsel who should lock herself up if she doesn't want to get eaten. Is he suggesting that women wear a burqa, never leave her house, and never date?   He was comparing a women to an **object**, a thing.  When is the last time you ever heard of a man being compared to an object?  
I always thought it would have been by a stingray.
Well, that's my point exactly. Allah is an approximation of Yahweh. Muhammad was illiterate that's why many stories of the Koran are badly transcribed plagiarisms of the Torah. He actually was trying for a fairly accurate replication but he had a poor memory and low comprehension skills.   Thus the differences from Old Testament stories lie mostly in Muhammad's misunderstandings of the Torah and him putting his own interpretation on things he failed to understand.   Other than that it's pretty similar mythology at least up until the end of the Torah.
Wow, thats inspiring .. would make a great video game.
&gt; rPS(α, β) = shit(α) + shit(β) - 42 &gt;  &gt; Where α is the HTML page and β the web browser used to render it. It is now trivial to prove that the visual correctness of an HTML page must be defined as 1 / rPS(α, β).   =/  EDIT: I forgot to say that "rPS" means "relative perceived shittiness"
How convenient that this Hitlary's campaign HQ would get hijacked like this and give her free press.
&gt; I don't blame American soldiers for the corruption of the government. They don't get to make policy. What does that have to do with anything? I'm just pointing out the fact they joined the US Army is testament to their stupidity.
We'll have the promo desk out this Tuesday. Mention Reddit and save 50% on your purchase of any caliber of ammunition, up to 500-count boxes, and save 25% on all K-Y brand lubricants.  See ya Tuesday!
Heh, brilliant insightful argument... succinct too. Way to go!
When Ron Paul is president, zero colleges will be investigated for unethical student loan practices.
And a clock tower, a few hundred feet of cabling and an electical storm.  Oh and of course at least one Christopher Lloyd.
$7.5 million raised for charity last year and this year is going to be even bigger! http://www.movember.com/au/home/  
In '99 or '00, (not sure) Alex Jones actually infiltrated bohemian grove and saw some of the stuff going on inside, using a tiny hidden camera to film whatever he could. He also did a follow-up later on which had some funny stuff with the spastic locals.  His delivery during his actual documentaries is much less grating.   http://video.google.com/videoplay?docid=-82095917705734983&amp;q=alex+jones+bohemian+grove&amp;total=339&amp;start=0&amp;num=10&amp;so=0&amp;type=search&amp;plindex=0  This is his bohemian grove documentary. He makes his stuff available on google video when he can, and you can feel free to download any of his stuff in higher res from torrent websites. What he wants more than anything is to get the word out; money is of little concern.  www.prisonplanet.com and www.infowars.com are run by him, and he has a few more sites out there.
&gt; I shat in your mother's mouth.  Boy, this is America.  I *shitted* in your Mother's mouth.  Then I tried to rape you, but you were too agreeable.  
So? We'll just print money out of thin air.
He says it's from a book. OCR error, perhaps?
And Super Dave Osborne.
Is that the ore or the explosive space modulator?
And, to preempt the "it's not programming" hosers. (yeah, I said it, you're hosers).  ahem.  _This is not programming_.  It doesn't mention variables. Or code. Or computers.  But I think it's relevant, and that programmers need to hear this sort of thing.  Maybe you don't!  If so, the down button is located right underneath the up arrow. Use it.  HAND!
This would be funny if there weren't millions of religious idiots in this country that believe this kind of stuff.
On the morning of Sept. 25, 2007, my daughter entered our bed room and said that the boyfriend had just slugged her and broke her phone.  She had locked the doors.  We went to the door while on the phone with 911 dispatch.  The boyfriend was throwing bicycles, chairs and flower pots at the entry.  He was "cracked" out and drunk.  He was threatening me with bodily harm.  The police arrived.  They started their routine and after two hours, the boyfriend made a hostile move on the biggest cop and that was all she wrote.  He went to jail.  We then depressured a bit and I got back to sleep until the states attorney minions began calling for the daughter.  They wanted her to appear at their office as soon as possible.  We got the daughter up about noon and she got ready for the trip "downtown".  She had not taken her medication.  She was hostile and she threw a punch at me.  I parried the blow and caught her wrist in one move.  She defused briefly and when I released her she threw another girl punch that landed  on my chest.  No harm done.  She then ran out the door with another phone and said that when was calling 911.  I called the non-emergency dispatch center.  I was on the phone with a fairly rational dispatcher for about 10 minutes.  She found that there was no 911 call from daughter.  We discussed if their needed to be an officer on scene.  I told her that mom and daughter were heading out the door now for the states attorney office.  I had a "Restricted Call Waiting" on the phone.  I rang off with the dispatcher and answered a call from a road deputy who wanted directions to my home.  I have my phone GPS enabled and his unit has a laptop that should have been exchanging pings with me.  He became beligerent and hostile and accused me of delaying his arrival at my home because he was unable to follow my directions.  When he arrived in front of my home, he raced to the door (I watched) and he pounded like he was about to do a kick open. (I swear to . . . on me mothers eyes."  I opened the door, I was ordered out and was given about a 30 second grilling on "WHY? DID YOU DELAY ME?  WHERE IS THE PERPETRATOR?  I had nothing for the whys but I did tell him that my daughter was on her way to the SAs office.  I was in cuffs and spread over the trunk of the car in the next 30 seconds.  The back up officer was on his shoulder mounted tac-com set all heated up about capturing . . . my daughter and her mother.  I was in cuffs and in the back of the car in front of my house for near two hours.  The arresting deputy started the paperwork, checking and getting other information from me and whatever.  That was intermixed with personal phone calls, leisurely draws on his clove cigarette.  The drive to the jail was about 20 minutes and I was read my rights at the entry to the processing facility.  I was there until 2:00am the next morning.  I had left my keys, wallet and phone on the hall table.  I have one land line number memorized.  I did not know my wife's new number.  I called my one landline number and discussed my situation with my elderly friends Jim and his wife.  I started ringing my cell phone and about midnight my women returned and answered it.  They had been with the horses all day.  They brought my bail money and I was out.  A week later the original officer appeared at my door.  He had a three stripe Sgt. as back up.  He quietly and politely collected statements all around and gave us each a victims rights book.  He was quite deflated and had the appearance of one who had been the victim of an extended ass eating.  Three strippers do not come as back up for laughs.  I have followed the development of this on the County Court web site and it is a pretty thin docket item.  It has died on the vine.  On Friday, past, I got my bail money back from the Clerk of the Court.  I am waiting now for my letter of apology, and my settlement check for my time and trouble.  I am giving them another week before I play my next card.  I now have some new first hand knowledge of the "system".  I went through a shift change with it multiple head counts.  I met some really interesting but troubled people in the processing center.  I overheard some desperate phone calls.  I do not wish to have a repeat.  I am looking for Archie Bunker's attorneys, Rabinowitz, Washington and Haddad.  My charge?  Obstruction by deception.
Not just that, pretentious and pathetic.
That is really F'd up...the state law should be amended to contain the federal inclusions as well.....  The father should go to jail....man thats some sick sh!t...
How dare you compare His Spaghettiness to a myth!
&gt;Adaptation has been observed on a macroscale, but adaptation is not evolution.  How do those adaptations happen, exactly?
Well, each incident like this brings me closer to creating a new user owned reddit.  I mean users would share in ALL decisions, and share the profits, etc.  Right now I just need a name for the site and some level of interest from the community.
We know your rabid hatemongering got your IP banned at digg and that you have been banned from other forums. You are not really a jew, but the son of a kaffir Arab and a Lebanese streetwalker. You say you are an atheist so you don't have to conform to society's standards of decency and can pick and choose your cheesy lifestyle with your bleach bottle blonde chain smoking barren goy bimbo. You are an impotent non working slug that thinks his NAMBLA club is just ok. Here is the joke of the century and your asswipe mentality: &lt;&lt;&lt;&lt;&lt;&lt;&lt;&lt;OK, lets talk peace from my objective point of view. Alright, as objective as I can be, since I'm an ethnic Jew, and I realize that Israel does serve a purpose right now, and probably the next 100 years at least, as a place of last refuge for any Jew to go to if anti-semitism gets ugly anywhere in the world. Right now, Israel needs to have a Jewish majority, but inevitably us Jews only need to be around 1.8% of any population in order to control just about everything:) &gt;&gt;&gt;&gt;&gt;&gt;&gt;&gt;http://baconeatingatheistjew.blogspot.com/ pusgut never proof reads his shiet: "There are protests right now to put that teacher to deth for naming the Teddy Mohammed."
Sometimes I smoke my credit in a bong.
Mighty ugly.
An old man turned ninety-eight  He won the lottery and died the next day  It's a black fly in your Chardonnay  It's a death row pardon two minutes too late  And isn't it ironic... don't you think   It's like rain on your wedding day  It's a free ride when you've already paid  It's the good advice that you just didn't take  Who would've thought... it figures  Mr. Play It Safe was afraid to fly  He packed his suitcase and kissed his kids goodbye  He waited his whole damn life to take that flight  And as the plane crashed down he thought  "Well isn't this nice..."  And isn't it ironic... don't you think  It's like rain on your wedding day  It's a free ride when you've already paid  It's the good advice that you just didn't take  Who would've thought... it figures  Well life has a funny way of sneaking up on you  When you think everything's okay and everything's going right  And life has a funny way of helping you out when  You think everything's gone wrong and everything blows up  In your face  A traffic jam when you're already late  A no-smoking sign on your cigarette break  It's like ten thousand spoons when all you need is a knife  It's meeting the man of my dreams  And then meeting his beautiful wife  And isn't it ironic...don't you think  A little too ironic...and, yeah, I really do think...  It's like rain on your wedding day  It's a free ride when you've already paid  It's the good advice that you just didn't take  Who would've thought... it figures  Life has a funny way of sneaking up on you  Life has a funny, funny way of helping you out  Helping you out
What is the point of this comic?
Most rack mounted machines do not have physical terminals.  no keyboards, no monitors. (Bar a few monitoring terminals..) The *only* way to use them is to either use a KVM switch or remote desktop/ssh into them. Isn't that obvious?  Having said that I'm not quite sure what Linux device drivers you're talking about that require developing them on a cluster. Perhaps you can enlighten me?
haha, your mom is a slut
http://swtch.com/~rsc/regexp/
OK. In other words, Muhammad having sex with a child is a myth but Muhammad going to heaven on a winged horse is literal truth? No pal, you can't have it both ways. Either all of it is true (then why respect a pedophile prophet?) or none of it is true - in which case why believe in a myth?
GASSING seems more appropriate than BREAKING for some reason.
Right after Econ tells us how it feels for a woman. I want to be able to compare and contrast.
I do, but, for some reason, this time, the word actually caught my attention as I breezed through the pile, and I looked at this post.  I DO think that it's silly though.  None of this stuff is breaking in the long run.
Who else cringed when they called Reddit part of the "blogosphere"?
[This non-flash  version](http://listverse.com/religion/top-10-organized-religions-and-their-core-beliefs/) may be easier to read.
Right. It's the difference between having multiple licenses and copyrights for different parts of the code, vs. having one copyright and GPL licensing for your additions/changes and the original untouched code being PD.
&gt; Analysis doesn't mean support. &gt; While Marx was an internationalist this must not be understood in terms of our understanding of globalization.  You should tell this to SuicidalWriter because that's exactly what I was saying.  &gt; Re: contradiction. This is key to understanding Marx, that's what dialectics is all about.  I understand dialectical / historical materialism, I just don't really buy it.  I don't think the idea that quantitative changes produce qualitative changes can be applied meaningfully to superstructures. Globalization is inevitable in the sense that capital demands it, but it is not the only social force and embracing because it could to a dead end for capitalism is very dangerous, but that may also be a dead end for humanity. Maybe it's true that the Russian revolution was doomed to failure because the same group cannot lead both the industrial and post-industrial revolutions. But I don't think this still applies and that letting the process continue will be beneficial. Class struggle is the important variable and further embourgeoisement of the working class will not help it.
Vader's ship.
But wait, there's more...
And now she, Obama, and Edwards can all stand tall and support S 1959 with no worries, because,obviously, we DO have "homegrown terrorists"! And they just happen to be "conspiracy theorists". Yet another timely coincidence...
http://politics.reddit.com/info/61txa/comments/
So long as the words "YOUR ANAL HYMEN!!!" don't follow, I'm okay with it. 
Only. "Only".  *only*  **only** about 40. Evel always did like to exaggerate.
He needs a good spanking... (BTW, this is all the Greenspan criticism is rubbish. He did what he was paid to do, keep the economy going under his watch DESPITE Bush).
&gt;“If you tell a lie big enough and keep repeating it, people will eventually come to believe it. The lie can be maintained only for such time as the State can shield the people from the political, economic and/or military consequences of the lie. It thus becomes vitally important for the State to use all of its powers to repress dissent, for the truth is the mortal enemy of the lie, and thus by extension, the truth is the greatest enemy of the State.” - Joseph Goebbels
Yup, I know it well...it's pretty bad. I used to do IT support for some offices in this area. Gladly, I don't have cause to use that intersection much anymore...
The white man who gets the Bose system in his car is virtuous and successful, the black man who gets the custom stereo on his bike is viewed to be a welfare nigger.  Simple racism, nothing more nothing less.
::Waits for people to tell JFK to take off his tin foil hat::
I can't believe this is even being discussed.  Of course, given that the 1st and 4th amendments have been essentially repealed by executive orders, I guess this one is next on the chopping block.  
Settled out of court with Kanye West just days ago. Goes to show that better not to tangle with a rap star, even if they don't come git ya, Jesus may anyway. 
Biker #4: I say we scalp him!  Biker Gang: [shouts] Yeah!   Biker #4: Then we tattoo him!  Biker Gang: [shouts] Yeah! Biker #4: Then we hang him!  Biker Gang: [shouts] Yeah!  Biker #4: And then we kill him!   &gt;name that tune.
&gt;Scholars believe the resemblance of the coastline to the actual coast of Antarctica to be tenuous. For centuries before the actual discovery of Antarctica, cartographers had been depicting a massive southern landmass on global maps based on the theoretical assumption by Europeans that one must exist, if only to balance the landmass of the North. From http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Piri_Reis_map
Dead at 69? I didn't realize it was so dangerous, especially considering all the other things he did. 
Ever heard of monotheism?
LOL! This sounds more like a crappy knock-off of Inspector Gadget.  "Geek Squad, **assemble!** Today, we investigate the *Mystery of the Stolen Porn!*"
What the fuck am I looking at?
Ratzinger was in the Hitler Youth because it was legally required of all boys. He abandoned his post in the war - true "Hitler Youth" would never have done that. He also rarely went to Hitler Youth meetings. I have a huge amount of admiration for the current pope. He is an incredibly intelligent, loving man. The Church never executed people for heliocentrism - Galileo was only given house-arrest. And that house-arrest arose from disobeying the pope, not from heresy. I agree with almost all that the Catholic and Orthodox churches hold to, including issues of sexuality. If you want to have a state civil union, that's fine by me, just don't expect the church to bless that union.
money: I have at least $2.00 at any time in my savings account... Check power: I know how to turn a computer on... Check muscles: All human beings are born with muscles... Check. W00ts... Now I feel sad :(
Queens is pretty flat.  Not like you'd ever go there.  Too many forrrrrners for you probably.
Now that's a great example of a ludicrous lawsuit. "Satisfaction Guaranteed!"
your ideas intrigue me and I would like to subscribe to your newsletter.
Too late. He made a total ash of himself a long time ago.
Since when is an Atheist been in charge of leading executions and tortures during the Middle Ages or The Inquisition? Must have been a bad brew of beer the Pope drank that morning...
Ron doesn't buy tickets for his supporters.
Wouldn't you have to write the formula backwards in arabic or hebrew? :P  6?  &lt;=  (3,2,1)المبلغ
Speaking as a recovering agoraphobic, HELL YEAH!
Cute, but inapplicable. Please demonstrate where in the conversation ***between you and I*** Ron Paul's status was topical to the conversation.
On the morning of Sept. 25, 2007, my daughter entered our bed room and said that the boyfriend had just slugged her and broke her phone.  She had locked the doors.  We went to the door while on the phone with 911 dispatch.  The boyfriend was throwing bicycles, chairs and flower pots at the entry.  He was "cracked" out and drunk.  He was threatening me with bodily harm.  The police arrived.  They started their routine and after two hours, the boyfriend made a hostile move on the biggest cop and that was all she wrote.  He went to jail.  We then depressured a bit and I got back to sleep until the states attorney minions began calling for the daughter.  They wanted her to appear at their office as soon as possible.  We got the daughter up about noon and she got ready for the trip "downtown".  She had not taken her medication.  She was hostile and she threw a punch at me.  I parried the blow and caught her wrist in one move.  She defused briefly and when I released her she threw another girl punch that landed  on my chest.  No harm done.  She then ran out the door with another phone and said that when was calling 911.  I called the non-emergency dispatch center.  I was on the phone with a fairly rational dispatcher for about 10 minutes.  She found that there was no 911 call from daughter.  We discussed if their needed to be an officer on scene.  I told her that mom and daughter were heading out the door now for the states attorney office.  I had a "Restricted Call Waiting" on the phone.  I rang off with the dispatcher and answered a call from a road deputy who wanted directions to my home.  I have my phone GPS enabled and his unit has a laptop that should have been exchanging pings with me.  He became belligerent and hostile and accused me of delaying his arrival at my home because he was unable to follow my directions.  When he arrived in front of my home, he raced to the door (I watched) and he pounded like he was about to do a kick open. (I swear to . . . on me mothers eyes."  I opened the door, I was ordered out and was given about a 30 second grilling on "WHY? DID YOU DELAY ME?  WHERE IS THE PERPETRATOR?  I had nothing for the whys but I did tell him that my daughter was on her way to the SAs office.  I was in cuffs and spread over the trunk of the car in the next 30 seconds.  The back up officer was on his shoulder mounted tac-com set all heated up about capturing . . . my daughter and her mother.  I was in cuffs and in the back of the car in front of my house for near two hours.  The arresting deputy started the paperwork, checking and getting other information from me and whatever.  That was intermixed with personal phone calls, leisurely draws on his clove cigarette.  The drive to the jail was about 20 minutes and I was read my rights at the entry to the processing facility.  I was there until 2:00am the next morning.  I had left my keys, wallet and phone on the hall table.  I have one land line number memorized.  I did not know my wife's new number.  I called my one landline number and discussed my situation with my elderly friends Jim and his wife.  I started ringing my cell phone and about midnight my women returned and answered it.  They had been with the horses all day.  They brought my bail money and I was out.  A week later the original officer appeared at my door.  He had a three stripe Sgt. as back up.  He quietly and politely collected statements all around and gave us each a victims rights book.  He was quite deflated and had the appearance of one who had been the victim of an extended ass eating.  Three strippers do not come as back up for laughs.  I have followed the development of this on the County Court web site and it is a pretty thin docket item.  It has died on the vine.  On Friday, past, I got my bail money back from the Clerk of the Court.  I am waiting now for my letter of apology, and my settlement check for my time and trouble.  I am giving them another week before I play my next card.  I now have some new first hand knowledge of the "system".  I went through a shift change with its multiple head counts.  I met some really interesting but troubled people in the processing center.  I overheard some desperate phone calls.  I do not wish to have a repeat.  I am looking for Archie Bunker's attorneys, Rabinowitz, Washington and Haddad.  My charge?  Obstruction by deception.
Ya know, feminists give rape prevention classes pretty frequently.  So they are aware that there are ways to minimize the risk of a man raping you without your consent. Perhaps you don't mean to, but you left out the part that most rapes are committed by someone the victim trusts.  How do you suggest women protect themselves against that?   
It's got electrolytes!
Yeah, except he used a baseball bat and his friend held the guy.
Gameboy.
Thank God I'll be dead soon.
Oohhh look! A troll with wings!
You can be an atheist without hating or being prejudiced towards theists...
?  Get over it and move on with life.  Stop playing the victim.  And no American Indian alive today was "fucked", so it would be impossible to do it again.
it's upside down and ROT-13d, I think.
Wow, you must be the king of the straw man attack.  Let me try- you are obviously the type of person who kicks puppies.  How awful.  Don't kick puppies you horrible person.  
&gt; You are in effect trying to take over the  &gt; project for yourself, with a big "fuck you" &gt; to the original creators.  Look, if you knew anything about the history of qmail you would know that it's exactly the opposite.  Releasing to the public domain was DJB's attempt to send a big old "fsck you" to the GPL community.  The reality is that code released to the public domain can and will be put in a GPL wrapper... and that's not some odd corner case limited to DJB's code (the only corner case here is the DJB chose public domain over GPL).  Anyone with even a modes amount of intelligence or industry experience knows that once a public domain project gets its GPL wrapper, development proceeds from that point.  Companies that pick up the project for commercial use will chose GPL over the public domain version... why?  ...because they know that by contributing back into the project they get their code maintenance for "free" and the community/project benefits.  GPL is a software improvement process.  Public domain is not.  Is it any wonder that qmail got to this point?
[Way old news](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Terra_Australis)  People believed there was a massive southern continent long before the 1500's.
I have no clue what your on about 
That is pretty paranoid. He has of a sudden been polling fairly well, so he gets serious notice. All the stories appear around the same time as they were all started about the same point, and are staggered out by "gentleman's agreements".   Besides outside (but not too outside) candidates always get attention. It si something to talk about that the audience might not already be bored stiff of.   Besides I don't think either Newsweek or Rolling Stone has enough Republican audience to "whoop up" any rep. candidate or fill a small room for that matter. 
*Sounds like an anti-taser Paulbot to me*
God took the money I gave at church and gave me a little wafer at mass.  Is that evidence enough for you?
Former? I thought you guys can never go back from being Hindu? It's kinda like being born Jewish isnt it?
*After giving fellatio for many years*  Senator Larry Craig, is that you?
It will soon be broken.
&gt; Even using Very Long Baseline Interferometry to link two Arecibo-style radio telescopes on opposite sides of the planet– thereby providing a virtual radio telescope the size of the entire Earth– our antenna area would still be 20,244 kilometers too small.  Umm...  I'm not an astronomer, but my understanding is that VLBI gives the effective *resolution* of an earth-sized telescope (with limitations even on that), but does nothing to improve the light gathering (ie, signal-to-noise).  To gather the flux that would fall on a dish 33,000 km in diameter, one needs a dish which is 33,000 km in diameter.
Ever heard of reading with understanding?
I don't think people even read posts here. I'm sure it does have issues for some people, but for me it's been fine. One to one comparison, I've heard much more negative feedback about Vista(and forget internet forums, I'm talking about real life), and I've lived it as well.  Have you used leopard for any amount of time, so you could personally verify issues with it? Because I've done that with Vista.
Ron Paul '08. Christians are stupid. The dollar will be worthless tomorrow.  I think that covers the other standard replies.
Nothing like watching old money holding on to its wealth in a death grip.  
I've never seen an article get so straight to the heart of what's wrong with the media. This should be posted everywhere. This should be a revolution.
&gt; and the text has not changed.  [insert picture of snowy owl here]
5 &lt;/sarc&gt; [Edit] What the hell? I typed in 5. and pushed publish and it came up as "1."... Ergh
You can deny it all you want but your message is so fucking obvious and predictable.
Chances are it will attract even more giving people, creating a volcanic explosion of generous people.
Someone already did:  [History of religion](http://www.mapsofwar.com/ind/history-of-  religion.html)
Just looks like a party to me.  Of course, I grew up among the hippies.
Altria's been doing well lately.
Same as communism; not much of anywhere.
&gt;FTA  you forgot the 'a' and 'w'
This is about the only thing the Playstation 3 is good for.
Sometimes I wish I could "save" comments.
You mean that all crumble below the engorged feet of the fabulous spaghetti monster?
Exactly. It's not the law. You're not in trouble. Unless you're the primary target of the G and reddit rules (spammers, etc.), then you have nothing to worry about.
So much for reddit being full of misogynistic atheist assholes?
Actually, our parents may have been worse. I for one never was at a party were guys had curlers in their hair, wore wigs and bikinis, and hugged each other stripped to their underpants! Man, what if you recognize someone from your family in those pictures ... 
So that's what Pac-Man looks like from the rear.
Agreed. The qmail documentation is fantastic, and is amongst the best vendor-documentation I've ever seen.  Also, about the installation: It was written in a time where installing an RPM or a deb wasn't always as easy as installing an RPM or a deb :)  I'd like to add that qmail's installation instructions are, infact easy enough to be followed by even a beginning unix-user who bothers to read the instructions *instead of guessing at what `make install` ought to do*
OverlySkeptical, you make a lot of sense. 
I'll drink to that. Cheers!
Good line.
More importantly, more money = more media time. Candidates are spending a money in, at most, 4 states.  In the other 46 states polling numbers are a reflection of media influence over name recognition and image.
My interest is in having fewer ads. Sooo.. if this makes advertising less desirable, sounds good to me.
Who is this multiheaded extremist?
You've witnessed the same thing that happened with Chinese coolies; use large amounts of immigrants (legal or not) to depress wages of local workers. Big business wins...again.
Mystery explained?  All they did was patch a hole in cold dark matter cosmology.  Hmm.
&gt;Most people are other people. Their thoughts are someone else's opinions, their lives a mimicry, their passions a quotation.   -Wilde
Outrageous!
" systems, when stably systemitized will systematically stablze as said system. in such said system stablizing, so systematically systemtizing said system. and so such as inivetible like such as system "
Keep this in mind the next time some lulzer says "the Internets r sirius bizness".
Then you're ignorant of what the very Pope you claim to follow says. He specifically condemns any STATE-based recognition of gay unions; he has spoken out against gay marriage and civil unions, and has tried to influence gay-rights legislation across the world.  And all the of the Hitler Youth abandoned it after, you know, Hitler died.  But you're right. The Hitler Youth thing was a an unfair shot, especially since there are so many legitimate reasons to resent the pope and the institution of the Catholic church.  Galileo recanted his theory that the Earth revolves around the sun; that's why he wasn't executed. The larger point I was making is that the Catholic church has a long, storied history of distorting truth to advance its dogma.
&gt;You actually had to "decode"? (though I never considered it so much "clever" as a bludgeoningly obvious thought).  I was just trying to make it clear that I was responding to what I believed you were implying with your sarcastic remark, and not what you actually said.  &gt;Go back and read the op/eds and arguments in favor of gay marriage. Almost without exception they claim the high ground based on "being born this way".  I find that more often than not, that is in a reply to the oft-repeated and unsupported assertion that being gay is a "lifestyle choice".  Although I don't belief that the question of choice vs. nature is relevant to any discussion about gay rights, I understand why so many would want to refute such a blatant yet commonly-accepted lie.  Even so, I still say the whole issue is a red herring regardless of who brings it up.  &gt;Sure you can argue other aspects of gay marriage, but you can't get there without human sexuality being a major part of the argument.  I disagree.  The debate is about basic human rights.  I think if any couple wants to be married, they should have a right to unless the government has a really good reason to say "no".  I haven't heard a good reason yet.*  Edit: Except incest.  Besides that, any two consenting adult humans should be able to get married.
(for ie users apparently)
I did, but I still don't know why.  Could you please enlighten us?  If it's so obvious that reading from the christian text should reveal it, I suppose you could at least quote certain passages in it?
Admiral Ackbar is the fish-alien (Mon Calamari) from Return of the Jedi.
Sikhism has the awesomest logo.  It looks like it's from a scifi movie.
We have these in Europe too you know, you get them in them the middle of cities too... (albeit with less sheep.)
Well, now we all need to band together and support Hillary in her time of need.  Yea...
Great for her! I want to go to Alaska sometime too. It's just wild, unharmed, isolated and beautiful.
ya coulda just left the "It" outta the title
Skikers rule!!!
You made up your mind before you gave your evidence that we made up our mind before we found out whether you did or didn't have compelling evidence.  Your turn.  We could do this for all eternity, you know.
Upmod for truthfulness and balls of iron. I applaud you, alecb.  Kinda provides some backstory, doesn't it? A illogical, bloodthirsty religion (see the teddy-bear fiasco) with a polygamist pedophile for a founder...
They are no doubt attempting to make people feel guilty and in danger for late starts. Or the reporter has a 19 year old girlfriend who is a virgin and he would rather that not be the case. "Hey, look at this article! You should lose your virginity now before you become dysfunctional!"
Do a barrel of monkeys.
Ass-clown would be mine.
Exactly! The final feeling I get of it - and I'm not debating thr rightness of wrongness of European settlement in the Americas - is something like "since the result of multiculturalism for us was to be slaughtered and put in reservations, you should consider following the same path".   Kind of reminds me the "Great Immigration Debate":  http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=YhEl6HdfqWM
someone forgot to take his meds
Beautiful design, but it's best that it stays like this only under construction. Libraries are better with natural light, and the choice of books would probably date a permanent facade in a bad way. I mean, Dan Brown? Honestly?  They're great advertisement, and I'd keep them around to pull out during events and construction.
As Christian/theist, I beg: please stop.  You're making us look stupid.
http://www.sable-pro.net/WHERE_IS_YOUR_GOD_NOW.jpg
so this is what it would be like if Facebook existed 40 years ago
I can only assure you I'm not a racist, and yes, my comment is totally subjective.  I think it was a foolish waste of money, but that's just the opinon of me and the people who clicked the up arrow by the comment. Only a preson obsessed with race would see racism in that comment.
Aim earlier, just to be sure ;) &lt;/sarc&gt;
http://reddit.com/info/61fta/comments/c02jafj  http://reddit.com/info/61fta/comments/c02jdfa  Props.  Redditers++  Princess Cruises--
&gt; I for one never was at a party were guys had curlers in their hair, wore wigs and bikinis, and hugged other each other stripped to their underpants!  You're missing out, man!   It's never too late to enjoy life!
Well I think the United States proves that elections are easily a fallacy. Clearly Chavez is power hungry and power corrupts. Do you think the USA should eliminate term limits?
The four corners show about the F-18s  http://www.abc.net.au/4corners/special_eds/20071029/hornets/default.htm
Hadith Sahih Bukhari 9.140 (Muhammad talking to Ayesha): "You were shown to me twice (in my dream) before I married you. I saw an angel carrying you in a silken piece of cloth, and I said to him, 'Uncover (her)[...]"  Is it not telling that all those Prophets of God(TM) never had visions of anything useful, like say, a cure for cancer or even something basic like penicillin or steam engine? Instead they were frequently instructed to have sex with young girls.   Even if the god of those prophets did exist (I'm confident he does not) I'd *never* worship it.
Politics.
Fraud implies that I have intentionally deceived someone. I haven't. If Google asked me why I clicked the link, I would have told them.
This is English, mofo. We don't need accents. Go back to Normandy. 
It was an innovative, powerful e-mail server program that was crippled by its restrictive license. Had DJB released it into the public domain a few years ago it might by now be the dominant mail server in the Unix world. It may be too late as Postfix and Exim have got a strong hold on the Unix mail server market. Nevertheless, it will be great to see what 3rd party developers are able to do with this.
This pope is a stone cold pimp.
That's why they are encouraging people to pledge to donate past the $350k they needed, because obviously some/a lot of people wont donate or wont donate as much as they pledged.   No one's going to ACTUALLY SEND that much money to some random guy on the internet who says he's a ron paul supporter. That's why they had to do pledges to see if they could get enough interest to bother setting up a PAC to collect the funds.  They'll set up the PAC, some people wont donate, others will donate extra, some who didn't pledge will donate. $500k isn't that much to be raised for ron paul. Once the ball is rolling I personally have no doubt they'll pull in enough for the blimp to happen.  Now, anyone saying all that money is "raised" is just being dumb, I'll admit it. Give it time though, this was the best way for them to go about their idea.   EDIT - I'm sure some idiots like you have pledged $5000 for fun with no intention to donate a penny, but having been a volunteer for the campaign myself when he came to the Bay Area I can personally attest to the honesty and integrity of Paul's supporters - THEY aren't manipulating that number, even if you might be. I didn't pledge to this, because I'm broke and I don't know if I can donate or not, but once they set up real donations I may well give $25 or something if i can afford it. 
Why must the sales be on the first day? Surely they have a number of copies they must sell (within a given amount of time, but not that briefly) to recoup their investment. But a million in a day for it to be economical? What if they sell one million in one day and no more? Is that better than selling 700k in one day and 600k the next? This claim sounds like Oral Roberts claim that he needed cash or God would kill him.
Instead of "educating" law abiding citizens who are trying to protect themselves and their property, you should "educate" the people actually committing crimes.
i wish i lived back then in those time.  shit on the internet man.
How about the [Loongson](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Loongson)?
Also, why the fuck is "Aisha Siddiqa ®" a registered trademark?
Note, everywhere Mattie uses "government", add "federal" right before it.  It should be obvious to the reader, but it's a concept often missed.
Translation: Might is right, even if not a very human brand of "might". 
It is rather curious, actually.  Most (all?) pedophiles are mainly interested in prepubescents; non-pedophiles by definition are not at all.  How common is it for a man who is otherwise attracted to adult (or at least pubescent) women to have one pedophile relationship?  It lends credence to kapuchinski's theory.
I really don't want to like you because you are a HillaryClintonFan and I despise her and I like simple labels and find it is easier to like or dislike someone over single issues.   But in this case I enjoyed your writing so much that I am going to overlook that we should be sworn enemies and just enjoy and upmod your post.
That's nice, but what's even nice is Brittany McDonald. Woof!
The Internet Knows.... :|
So THAT's what FTW means!
None of you heard of the ` key?   &gt; On a Mac, to get a character, such as à, the user must type Option-` and then the vowel. For example, to make à, the user must type Option-` and then 'a', and to make À, the user must type Option-` and then Shift-a.
I think most solar flare photos are taken with the solar disc obscured (and/or are outside of visible wavelengths...)
Evel Knievel broke bones that Chuck Norris *doesn't even have.*
You are right that I have only a nodding acquaintance at best with philosophy as a discipline.  That does not however prevent me from understanding your point.  I get it, and in so doing, I understand also that it is irrelevant to my point. &gt;Establishing that humans or nonhuman animals have certain behavioral tendencies tells us nothing about 'right' and 'wrong' - but only about what they are inclined to do or not do.  But that's not the point.  It was never my intention to discuss whether certain behaviors are right or wrong.  Rather, I sought to point out that there is increasingly good reason to believe that not only are our notions of morality not arbitrary, but they also seem to have a genetic basis.  The point is that it *does* give us a hint about where concepts of right and wrong come from.  If you go back to my original comment you will find that this is all I was ever suggesting.   
Not necessarily answerable... not every girl's had a yeast infection, thank GOD. Although one of my old roommates did, she had to get this medication that was injected by this unpleasant looking tube-needle-thing.  Another roommate of mine said she used to have one and used the slightly more old-fashioned remedy: yoghurt.   If you want, we can share tales of periods and tampons that most men probably wouldn't even want to THINK about, let alone come up with themselves. :)
&gt; I also believe the Bible is not complete, nor is what we have canonized, fully accurate.  compare and contrast (same person): http://reddit.com/info/61t1b/comments/c02kcij  Of course he could argue that the original writers wrote it wrong in the first place, and that each subsequent copier of the christian text copied accurately.  But if the first ones were already inaccurate...
So you spring for the expensive hooker and end up with a chapped, dirty ass and a queasy stomach.  We've all been there, buddy.
And I am sure that it is true as well.
I worked at a small mom-and-pop repair shop. Don't think they'll try and steal any less money from people than they can get away with. I'm sure not all do, but in less populated areas it's hard to get the volume needed to provide honestly priced service. I'd have felt better working for GS probably.
If you visited Fark even occasionally you'd be tired of this by now,
""It's not intended to simulate anything," corporate spokesman Kirk Seville told me yesterday, refusing to acknowledge the similarities between the candy and street drugs."  120% objective.
Megasmugs
Isn't that the company that sells murdered animals by the millions?  And fucking fat Americans stuff their faces with that shit, propped up on the backs of impoverished laborers.  You know they'd fucking sell burgers made out of immigrants if they could get away with it and make a profit.
My hiding place is Yoga where I can be alone and think. :) Thanks for sharing yours. It's creepy.
I havent watched star wars...ever
&gt;Ron Paul will transition to a national sales tax  False.
This is the second Reddit comments thread where I have seen that formula used... No doubt there are more.
He he.  Even without optimizeing, I tried both. The Lisp code runs *much* faster than the Haskell code. Maybe he didn't compile the functions?  (I'm using SBCL, and I compiled the functions before running them)
Well, there were about 6 Evel Knievel stories listed on the new listings and I was at an impasse as to which one to comment in. I almost picked the BREAKING one. I thought I'd wait until one was voted to the front page. Guess which did?
If only there were an article of some sort, preferably linked at the top of this very page, that discussed signal to noise for, say, the Arecibo telescope and typical omnidirectional transmissions...
It's not life-long presidency if it's a democracy. We don't have term limits in NZ, UK, AUS or Canada.   
  No mention of Harry Potter, Lord of the Rings or Di Vinci Code? The list fails.
What a load of horseshit, what planet are you living dude. Processes, mechanisms, whatever. That's like having the mafia "investigate" thier own crimes, give me a break.  Cops routinely get away with murder, assault, perjury, theft, you name it. So long as they enjoy a monopoly in the protection business, there will be  no balance of power to counter them, and their crimes will continue.
I like the "Your Haiku, please?" Fun challenge for the Friday afternoon.
&gt; So you spring for the expensive hooker and end up with a chapped, dirty ass and a queasy stomach.  Yeah, next time I think I'm going to make *him* be on the bottom.
These sorts of tests are usually more interesting on the pages of Cosmo. 
No it shouldn't...NEXT!
It must have been pretty dark.  ::drum tap::
&gt;girls are sugar and spice.  Three of them also inadvertently got an extra ingredient: Chemical X.
I'm going back to school and just got the news that my federally backed student loans have a higher interest rate than my mortgage. WTF?
That's not the laws of physics, it's current solar panel technology. If the choice is between economic collapse and finding a more efficient photovoltaic cell, I think we'd step up to the plate.   And let's not forget wind, tides, geothermal, etc, all of which are currently underexploited because they're not economically viable. (also, I'm not sure if you know this, but land doesn't have to be arable to have a solar panel on it. )
those are just horrible
You seem to have forgotten kucinich and Paul.
Actually it's usually made out of paper and ink.
agreed, its breaking outside of the defined area  of argument. I actually agree with you that its a utopian society that gives everyone an equal chance of success by maintaining that inefficiency. I was trying to think of a reason why that wouldn't make sense. Something about it seems counter-intuitive.
And you don't turn tricks to score Ice Breakers.
A reddit headline starting with "BREAKING" can only be both accurate and valuable if it links to a continuously-updated article/site/blog.  If the article is not going to change, than it's either obsolete by the time I see it or else not actually breaking news.
Are you kidding?
I half expected to see my father in there.  &gt;&lt;  he's been everywhere, and met everyone.   Example: Before I was born, the actress who played 6m dollar woman slept in my room for a summer. So it wouldn't surprise me to see him pop up in those pics too. 
Gregor Samsa woke up one morning in his family's apartment to find himself inexplicably transformed into a Geek Squad member. 
wow, we get the picture, stop submitting md5 articles.
&gt; Only a preson obsessed with race  I sort of am, I mean just look at my username.
Wow, 25 minutes? that's weak. I was expecting few hours.
awww, somebody saw a scary boogy man in the closet?  Poor poor people.
SHA-1 and SHA-256/SHA-512 are good alternatives. SHA-1 has been partially weakened, but it is still very strong. No known attacks have been found for the newer SHA variants, though of course that is always subject to change.
this _is_ news (i didn't think so at first, either)  better headline: MD5 is doubly-dead  this is a much stronger attack than before.
It only examines smtpd fingerprints amongst a very small sample and doesn't say why they think 400,000 domains are representative, nor even what the selection criteria is of their "old-school" partner in this.  Yahoo! infact uses qmail, but might be listed separately in that report. Who knows what else they've misrepresented.  There is one thing I thought was interesting: They only found 10% of these sites had MX records.
There seems to be some dissent as to the accuracy of that account.  http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Criticism_of_Muhammad#Aisha
I'm glad we have you to to be the Moral Compass of reddit, O Hosiah of Internetville.
No my friend.  I didn't have a choice.  If I had a choice, I'd rather much believe in God, because at least I could think that someone could make things better when I screw up.  But reason and logic compel me to accept that there is no proof of god, any god; Occam's Razor then cuts the supporting "maybe god exists but doesn't want to give proof".  So perhaps I should rail against logic and reason for taking away a choice, an option I wanted to have; except that as a programmer I define myself by my logic and reason.
Billywitchdoctor.com work mostly with chicken...
isn't perl already bad enough?
When I say "shitty car", I mean "bass is so loud that when the sub starts kicking you can actually hear the entire car rattle".  First, this just leads to you needing a alarm system that costs more than your car just to protect your stereo.  Second, that means you don't really "like" your music but instead you want to share your music with everyone in a 10 block radius (whether they want to listen or not).  And last, these cars usually spend half their time broken down -- why not use the money wisely and buy a car that won't break down or looks like shit when your cruising down the street with your stereo at ear-ringing volume just trying to get attention?
NO!!! DIFFER NET!
And about damn time too... Portishead rules!
In short: "Your right to wave your fist around ends where my nose begins"
That sounds like a bad publicity:  **MD5 DEAD!** *(1)*  ------  (1) MD5 not actually dead.
Rad, man.  Have you actually tried that?
Well I think it'd be *healthier* for a society to not allow homosexual civil unions, yet if it'll get you guys to quit complaining constantly for "equal rights", then let it be. I'm tired of hearing about it.
[Yes](http://ipsnews.net/interna.asp?idnews=22242). And in some places it's [surprisingly common](http://www.pbs.org/now/shows/341/facts.html).
I assumed from the title alone that Princess Cruises had actually decided to do the right thing. Nope.  This story still has a sour ending.
[12.  16 if you count ketchup.](http://www.bk.com/#menu=2,-1,-1)
I second that.
A decent point. I'm currently designing a portal for old people. I'm not thrilled that I've been asked to include a text resize widget, but I do understand the reasoning behind it. Grandma just isn't going to figure out the keyboard shortcuts.
So it's not that our generation has less morals it's just that we have more cameras!
BTW, I'm not a Roman Catholic, I just think the pope kicks ass.
How does any of that mean "fundamentalist"? Let me see: adult stem cells good, abortions bad, climate change not enough info.
definitely.  runs linux, fairly cheap for a consumer and also a ton of cores.  I'm tempted to get one just so I can experiment with writing parallel code to do ridiculous things.
...and you can use these low power devices:  http://www.routerboard.com  to run your local and medium haul network infrastructure.  Now, would someone like to show me some low power long-haul data communications equipment (no satellite stuff, please).
I'd keep the Guinness (not that I could possibly do anything with more than a couple kegs), pour the other worthless crap down the sewer.
Downmodded for being a waste of bandwidth.
I agree.  Not only is it week, but I could see it coming from a mile away.  
"atheism was responsible for some of the "greatest forms of cruelty and violations of justice" in history." Bullshit. Dogma is responsible for ALL of the "greatest forms of cruelty and violations of justice" in history." Just because religion doesn't have the monopoly on dogma doesn't make it any less repugnant. Open-mindedness isn't responsible for any of this stuff.
New American startup (NSA) is indexing public and private internet communications. The weather at 10.
So you traveled back in time not to avoid going to prison but to tell us that you will be in jail next year?
Not anymore!
We now have 3 new website directories for you to submit to. Don't be put off by the low Page Rank of these sites as they will increase in PageRank over time and start charging for submissions when they do. Not submitting to these directories at this stage, when they're free, could mean losing the opportunity of getting a free link in what could be a much higher PR paid directory later.
 Attention moderation nazis: downmodding something simply because you disagree is horse shit. The guy has a point. Get it.
Hear hear - let's make the next Reddit meetup a good one, people. You've gotta live your life!
&gt; Why I picked my screen nick is none of your business   Wow, so defensive because someone wanted more information. Ya know, most people come to reddit to share information. You just come here to troll.
Why should the wealthy shoulder it? Just because they are wealthy? Stupid.
srsly. I'm looking forward to throwing my fourth annual naked picture party soon.
Yes, but I also hate comments stories about what good or bad about Reddit.   As for BREAKING, I just reflexively vote down.
Don't make fun of gluttons! Gluttony is a deadly sin, not a slur ride at a fun park for making fun of fat asses who eat so much they get phone calls from God, "Remember when Jesus fasted?" 
The reason we don't enforce those laws is because corporate interests benefit GREATLY from employing undocumented workers. That's the sick big lie of the whole anti-immigration movement.
Oh no! Disaster!
Who's trolling? I'm serious.
i let my dog pick his name.  I put out 7 options on pieces of paper and showed each one to him.  Then, i put him in a cage until he was half starved and desperately needed something to eat.  I showed him the names again and dipped them in bacon grease and laid them out on the floor.  the first one he ate was his name.  the starving was just for fun.
And so can you!
Yes. For example, I voted this one down.
I want one.
&gt; If you browsed my comment history, you'd know that I support NO candidate in this election, period. Nor the election, nor the current bogus political system.  Yes, because we all view everyone's comment history every time we reply to anyone. We then spend at least three hours reading through all of their comment submissions from the last three weeks, minimum.  Failing to do so makes someone a "stupid asshole".  Seriously, GTFO.
Shoot. This'll be fun.
Yeah, Ron Paul is a neocon who has been cleverly laying low as a strict constitutionalist believing in individual liberty for the past 20 years.  Be ye not fooled.  Be ye not fooled.
It's mandatory for the Pope to fuck you on Slashdot?
The only feature I'd say is unique to qmail is that it makes it possible for your users to control their own addresses without programming. Up until today I'd seriously consider switching to any MTA that offered this feature.  The big downside was that it didn't have distribution support. This means installation for smaller sites is more complicated, and the fact is there are a lot more small sites than big sites.  For big sites, qmail is marginally easier to bend to the more specific requirements that show up with big sites. Of course, if you don't have to manage a big site, this probably isn't quite as meaningful.
You are certainly on to something here. In addition to violating minors, orders for slaughtering those refusing to believe the Prophets are also very popular vision material.  Why doesn't God instead simply inspire His chosen vessels with better arguments? 
Creationists predict you won't go to heaven.
I'd buy one, but I don't think I'd have the guts to wear it in public.
jeez, give it a rest
Thank you for confirming everything I suspected about you. See? Prejudice can be correct, as long as you apply it to what people believe, not how or where they were born.
HD dvd's is a subtle way to fight piracy.   It is much harder to download and store 20 gb movie than 4-5 gb movie. In fact if hd-dvd capacity would allow, media companies would jump to much higher resolution, not because it makes any difference, or they want to give better product, but because file sizes will grow dramatically, making movie copying and downloading unpractical.
We're going to have to agree to disagree on this one.  I don't believe much of what you think is true.  I believe Americans and Europeans mess too much in their business which DOES provoke them.  That regardless of your personal feelings, Islam is not, as a whole, the violent monster that you may think it is.  Are there radicals in all religions, absolutely, but maybe not to the degree in Islam. I don't believe the antithetical idea.  Why are they not attacking the Vatican? Switzerland, Canada?  The list goes on..  Prevention; as I said stay out of their business as much as possible, be prepared for violence if it happens and deal like with like.  It is not our job to police the world and impose our values on others.  Prevent human rights violations, yes, but we even seem selective on that. (See the American Indian)  I understand the Islamo-Facist argument, but I disagree.  And are we stopping them from slaughtering us or others?  If we are policing the world, why just Islam??
They are limp wristed.
What is with all of this bristling past reporters business? Isn't he supposed to be pandering? Something is wrong here.
Hi, welcome to the internet!
* But it is terminally ill.
No they don't, at least not 99.99% of them.
That's an interesting statement. It reminds me of something an openly gay friend of mine told me, about how the internet has basically killed the traditional SF gay scene. Go into the Castro on any weekend and it's pretty tame--coffee shops and a couple bars, but not the lascivious  debauchery that is associated with that community in the 70s and 80s. While I think about that a lot, I've never thought about it affecting other segments, but I suppose that it absolutely has (from access to porn, to online personals and CL "random encounters," to the potential threat of bad behavior being shared on Myspace/Youtube). Hmmm. This is disappointing...
awesome.  let the wasp larva thing eat a hole into the cockroach and then cure it.  I want know what would happen.
You can block the referer (note the misspelling.  That's how it's actually spelled).
Radioactive decay doesn't kill people, I kill people.
Not going to upmod you, but I won't downmod you in honor of a hilarious Reddit persona.
$155 for a damned hooded sweatshirt?  The thing better be made of baby chipmunk fur sewn by blind cave monkeys from Atlantis.
Because the article isn't real.
So clicking a link on the internet is similar in any way to smashing the windows of a campaign office? No.   I mean, not unless you're clicking the final link on a site to hire people to smash the windows of a campaign office. (Hey, neat idea for a website and a business!)
it's unethical to make advertisements look like  news.therefore it is not unethical to sabotage his campaign this way
Does BK make its own ketchup or do they buy it from a supplier?
I know, it's awful quality, but I simply couldn't resist the opportunity for copyright infringement.  http://youtube.com/watch?v=-GalEplA_aE 
You can block the referer (note the misspelling.  That's how it's actually spelled).
Who?
Chiaterrorist, just add jihad!
History comes alive! This reminds me of the scene in Raiders of the Lost Ark when Belloq says to Indy, "This watch is worth ten dollars from any vendor on the street. But bury it in the sand for 1,000 years and it becomes PRICELESS!" I guess it really only takes 65 years!
Why backup the whole folder every day??
A) I thought George Burns died several years ago.  B) It was funnier in Dead Poet's Society  and   C) Ellen Degeneres did this bit much funnier than Huckabee.
Well, sure, but those shmucks clearly didn't have a reactor handy, or even know how to use one.  Otherwise, they would have been happier with their purchase.
Biden is a fscking loser... a "threat" from him is about as empty as a justification for war from Bush.  Someone needs to break the news to Biden:  1 - he's not going to be selected as vice president by whomever wins the nomination.  2 - he's going bald... let it go already, lay off the Rogain and just go Kojak (I can just hear him stammering: but, but... there's never been a bald president; my retort:  Yeah and there's never going to be a president named "Biden" either, you racist Delaware hillbilly!).
&gt; racist   You keep using that word. I do not think it means what you think it means. 
they built something...with their own hands. what's more awesome than that? when was the last time you made something? i bet every piece of clothing you wear is from the gap and your apartment looks like an IKEA catalog. loser.
If there was an ancient religious text that went like this: "Verily I say unto thee, thou shalt remember that the power of all that is and was and will be in heaven and earth is like its heaviness times briskness of a ray of light multiplied unto itself", then I'd be very willing to take a second look. Of course I'd first assume pious fraud but that's another matter altogether...
Apparently you have missed almost every single article written on alternate energy  in popular science rags in the last year. Heck even WIRED covered biodiesel from algae. And I thought mr splashy pants was a ill informed narcissist, damn whale.
That ticket would be bizarre.  The only thing those candidates have in common is ending the war.  And a few nutty supporters in Berkeley.
brandweeknrx submits hijacked materials. I mean why not just link to the original article?
Oh no! Watch out redditors! She's an Xtian pretard! Clearly she doesn't deserve any help or sympathy from anyone!  EDIT: Sarcasm for those of you who are dumbasses.... Just making a point about the asshole redditors out there.
yes, that would be a stronger class of attack. roughly:  previous attack: you'd have to write code that performed one of two actions based on the value of a block of arbitrary junk in the middle/end of your file. anybody examining your trusted image may see code that does two different things based on the value of some 'constant' blob.  this attack: you can make two completely different programs, and just tack some junk on the end of each one. anybody examining your trusted imagine may see some random crap tacked on at the end, but the code would appear on the up and up.
My pubes are going to fall out?
Lost isn't reality TV (at least not for any reality I'm a part of), but I wouldn't mind if they started preventing it anyway.
Pretentious overreaction by self-aggrandizing drug enforcement thugs.  I've never seen drugs packaged that way. People who are not in drug law enforcement or who have not been in high school or college since this type of packaging became popular would have never seen such packages.
I fail to see how clicking a link on the internet is in any way the same as taking all the condiments at McDonald's. Although, if both things cause problems for the businesses involved, perhaps they should change their business models to compensate.
Interesting self-inclusive statement.
That is why he(she?) is happy.  Ignorance is bliss.
&gt; I believe Smith was concerned with the well-being and prosperity of the majority, first and foremost.  I usually despise the masses, but this makes sense. The reason why most revolutions happen, as any radical leftist will tell you, is because the masses are displeased. This is why the welfare-state is a good middle ground. And capitalism can survive and possibly the welfare-state can, in the future, be dismantled a little to make more room for the market. 
Two words, people: rye ergot.  That will be all.
Heh heh heh - "nad"!
SHHHHHHHHHHH
Morrowind's water looked a bit too much better than everything else in my opinion :/ Great game though.
Yeah, way to advertise worthwhile literature.  Cornwell gets two mentions and Brown gets any at all.  Plus ten points for concept, minus a hundred for taste.
Great story with a nice ending.  I just hope that in a few months we don't find out that the reason she wanted to go to Alaska was because she's always wanted to hunt baby seals, or something like that.
&gt; Well technically it means you hate all semites, not just the arabs. It's just that virtually all semites are arabs and a very tiny percent of jews are semites.  No, it doesn't mean that technically either. If you actually read the link you'd know that. Either way, the public protocol is that "antisemitism" refers to hatred of jews, and not anyone else. The word "semites" was used to depict jews the same way as "zionists" is used today. It's a way around sounding racist .  &gt; But I'll use the term judophobe from now on.  [You are not funny](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Judophobia)
Sorry he's a hetero man.
39,500 of which are planning to put a pirated copy of XP on it.
He already passed Il Duce's entire Q4 mark.
I bet she misses the flight again
if only it worked the other way around...
"Flooz.com was a perfect example of a "what the heck were they thinking?" http://www.cnet.com/4520-11136_1-6278387-1.html
and get your cardboard out
Obviously the picture was taken at night when the sun is much dimmer.
I like it!
Exactly. Which just goes to show how artificially low most speed limits are. The major highways, for instance, naturally like to travel at 65 to 75 mph. Thus, the State sets the limit at 55 in order to have an excuse to write tickets every time the municipality needs cash (or in Mayor Rudy G.'s case, to get laid). So, if you let everyone drive to the conditions of the road and set the limit accordingly, traffic would only move as badly as at present. The police should be there for one purpose only: to protect the innocent and those who can't defend themselves. Do we get this? No! We get traffic cops who are naught but an armed gang of otherwise unemployable bullies and thugs -- tax collectors with a gun -- no better than the highwaymen of old, and just as much of a drain on society. 
So how does fundable.com work now that she declined the money?  Does all the money get sent back to the people who donated it?  edit: perhaps I should have looked at the website before I asked this question :)
&gt; She's catholic AND a women So was Mother Teresa (although she was singlular ;-) Awesome story.
Apology accepted.
Then why is it news if also 99.99% of muslims didn't protest about the teddy bear?
At this pace, in three years we'll have games that cannot be told apart from real life, but they will all play exactly the same as FarCry or Battlefield or Half-life...
You've completely missed the point.  It has nothing to do with "restricting" what can be done, it's about him preferring the end users not being able to use his code on their chosen platform in the name of "freedom."  Hypocrisy in short.
One mans confidence is another man's rape.
Well they most certainly aren't implicating persons who partake in high-speed automobile competitions.
I sentence you to 15 days in prison.  Be glad, because others wanted your head!
don't think so
At least I am not unemployed :)  Good Luck with your strike..... NOT!
&gt; intellient christians (i'm not including the pope)  Not including as intelligent, christian, or both?
actually kinda sexy
"'When are you going to schedule hearings on impeachment?' I began... 'As a subcommittee chairman I can't make that decision, it's up to Chairman Conyers ... Impeachment can never work, it wasn't designed for a two-party system, that's why we've never removed a President' he said. 'So then we should tear up the Constitution?..."
Clearly fake.  Reddit search doesn't work that well.
"stumps", is that the best the god botherers could come up with...sheesh, lame, lamo, lame...  it's the equivalent of castigating someone for not be able to answer "how long is a piece of string?"
&gt; [Surda](http://reddit.com/user/Surda/):  &gt;  So reddit's linking to racist sites now?  &gt; I guess since Ron Paul is a racist, you people have to try and emulate him.  Where did you find racism on faithfreedom.org? I couldn't find anything racist. In fact, [it claims to be non-racist](http://www.faithfreedom.org/faq/10.htm).
Are you downmodders expecting nudie shots? Did I say NSFW? Thought so!
You're oversimplifying if you say that anyone who is in the US Army is stupid. Some families regard joining the US Army a very important family tradition. Some people joined back when we were discussing blowjobs instead of torture. There may be some people who join for the wrong reasons and they may be ignorant, but you're painting with too broad a brush to dismiss them all as stupid.
Are they still a RIAA band?
What a jerk.  
well, what i really mean is that when i click on a link on reddit, i wish i could be sure that the site wasn't going to be seeing that i was coming from reddit. especially for political polls where they just write us off as coming from some crazy community, rather than just viewing everybody as people (IPs, whatever).  i used to have a referer-blocking firefox extension; i should get it again. there's little reason for referer to be in the http spec in the first place.  (i had thought so about the spelling, but the red underline won me over)
The physics engine also needs an update.
Thanks, m8.  I just thought it was rather absurd to open up new and see a screen full of 'teh clinton hostages!!!!!' When I saw Evel died, I came back to reddit to submit a story. I didn't, however because there were 6 at the time.  
Wow! (Thanks for the stats.)
This really is something that has bothered me for some time. I get that there are many issues for which it is hard to state that someone is being truthful or lying, *but sometimes you can*.
newspaper FTW
&gt;Instead of "educating" law abiding citizens who are trying to protect themselves and their property,   This is a deliberate misstatement.  He didn't abide the law, he wasn't protecting his property, he in all likelihood wasn't protecting his life, and he definately wouldn't have needed to protect his life if he had followed orders, and let the police do the job they're paid to do.  I can tell you this much.  If I were his neighbor, he wouldn't be getting a big thank you card for murdering two people on my lawn to save a few of my little trinkets.  This kind of foolishness endangers MY right to own a gun, and I don't appreciate it.
Yeah, notice how skinny everyone was back then?  Not a single ounce of fat on any of them ... 
Wow. So true. I can almost see the ramps around the corner.
Reagan only talked the talk, but proceeded to balloon the military-industrial complex to a ridiculous size (dwarfed only by how much Bush Jr. has expanded it). He didn't walk the small government walk.  There aren't too many people who believe that Ron Paul is like that.
MD5 has been undesirable for *security* purposes for several years.  It's still very useful for detecting data corruption (used like a CRC, which was never intended for security), generating unique keys, etc..
In the interest of political correctness, this hould read "Aisha the Child Wife of Muhammad: &amp;quot;...Holy Prophet married Aisha when she was 6-years-old and consummated his marriage with her when she was 9. He was then 54 years old - **Not that there's anything wrong with that!"**
9 year olds, dude.
If a "corporate person" commits a felony, can you put its virtual ass in prison? :P
Well, that's not quite correct. See, Christianity *is* a belief system. They believe things like life after death. There are consequences to such beliefs. And calling people on that is reasonable.  But I do agree with you that blaming any Christian for things that Christians in the past did or a minority of extremists now do is silly.
Could be very useful!
Put a 1 next to each teen that looks familiar. If you think you know what a term means but aren't sure, Obviously he failed the regular literacy test.
If I saw someone wearing a shirt like that, I'd probably spontaneously throw my drink at them - and I'm an atheist!
I was going to say rats with no limbs, but glued to stones beats it hands-down.
Stability and extensibility are not two extremes of the same scale. It is possible to have both.
Why I Switched To Tampons: As you probably know, girls have two main options to keep from bleeding everywhere for a week every month: pads or tampons. There are also those weird little cup things, but whatever. I used pads for YEARS because the idea of walking around all the time with something inside me freaked me out, plus horror stories about TSS.   You may not know: Pads are FUCKING UNCOMFORTABLE. Especially certain kinds that have plastic-y sides (wings, the part that holds them onto the underwear). One day I was wearing an especially uncomfortable one since I was out of any others. I had to do a TON of walking that day to get around to classes and appointments, and really fast in some cases. Uncomfortable Pad was meanwhile scraping against my leg the whole time I walked, which hurt like hell but I didn't have a chance to stop and change it. When I got to my late-afternoon lab class, I looked down and realized blood was seeping through my pant legs, and thought, "Aw fuck, I thought I still had time before I'd need to change this one," and went to the bathroom. Turns out the pad was fine - I JUST HAD AN ENORMOUS BLEEDING GASH RIPPED IN MY THIGH from where the pad had been rubbing all day.   Let me tell you it is awkward walking into an office asking for a large bandage and a tampon.
i was saying that he is not intelligent. 
You're talking about NASCAR aren't you?
He should call it the bring Jesus to the U.S. bill. No one will vote against it.
A psychopath tyrant who doesn't care about killing innocent people (like the terrorists) would drop 4 hydrogen bombs in iraq right now and just finish off the americans and Iraqis. Goodbye.  Corrected it for you.
granted.  still, nice PR for fundable.
See, the problem with donations coming to help people who get scammed out of money by companies is that the companies then still get paid twice as much for the same service, or if the donations end up going to another company, the first company still gets to keep the money that they stole in the first place.  Sure, you can say that the bad publicity hurts them, but what I would rather see than contributions is the company being forced to relent and give back what they stole in the first place.
http://www.answers.com/allot&amp;r=67
I might agree with him.  I would say most people aren't poor and miserable.  Even if you do, I would be interested in hearing what your solution to the problem is. I am pretty sure that massive transfers of wealth from the rich to the poor via government won't solve the problem.  I can't claim to be an expert, but I doubt Adam Smith does either.
02f0c75da3aece386d91260eb3648617 is the md5 sum of what i think of this article.
Right.  All humans are evil.  Can you at least *try* not to be?
Who knows? Some pedophiles can probably function in adult relationships even if they're not really happy. The other thing is that from time to time people have been observed to develop urges of that nature usually as a result of brain tumors, head trauma etc. There was a guy a few year back who turned into a pedophile when his brain tumor grew. After they ablated the tumor his urges disappeared. When the tumor grew back they appeared again.
Aw, that's so sweet. :)
though i did not participate in this story, it does show that people do make a difference. if we can help a kind women realise a dream, just think of the other things that could happen if we focus as a group...
NSFW = [Naked female "tatas"](http://www.squareamerica.com/images3/pa48.jpg) (Also, check the one below it.)
No.  This is clearly a hoax designed to tick you off.
WOOHOO. Another brilliant exportable commodity from the heart of darkest Africa.
&gt; Why would "wackjob" have such a restricted definition? It's broad term, meaning something like "crazy person".  If there is clear evidence that something is a certain way, lets say the apple is red, then its a wackjob that says its blue. If someone is talking about a fruit that you have never seen nor heard of before yourself, how can he be a wackjob for saying its blue?   You don't even know if the fruit exists, maybe it is blue. Maybe he doesn't even know it exists and is simply making a guess, is he a wackjob for making a guess alone?  &gt; Atheists have a perfectly good reason for not believing that God exists: namely, that there is no evidence that God exists.  Absence of proof is not proof of absence though. Therefore you have no proof of god's non-existence. You have only shown the lack of theists proof of existence. You're both at square one as far as your proofs stand.  Dawkins admits this stalemate and agrees this technically makes him an agnostic, but that the odds of theists proving their case are so out of the realm of possibility that he feels safe assuming the opposite. Its not a proof of non-existence, just that the theistic proof is so remote of ever occurring that the opposite must be true.  Harris finally resolved himself to a similar line of reasoning by saying that the theists haven't formulated a religion yet that is possible and so he is an atheist until such time as they prove their case. Again he's not relying on any proof of the non-existence side of things, just on the failure of the theistic side of things.  Still its a bit disingenuous to argue that god doesn't exist and all you can show is that your opponent hasn't proven anything to you. Many people always pull out the line "the burden of proof rests with them". But thats not logical to assume the opposite until proven otherwise, because the opposite of your failure to prove that god doesn't exist is that he does in fact exist.  How does this apply to ron paul being a wackjob? Because you haven't shown that anything is wrong with what he has said. He made some assertions of a "new world order" and your only criticism is that it hasn't meet your level of burden yet. You haven't proved the non-existence of this "new world order", just that you're not convinced yet.  Some people believe god exists because of the bible and that meets their level of burden. Some people believe in a new world order because of some small degree of evidence as well.  For example: Do you believe in life outside the confines of earth? Doesn't that make you a wackjob then to believe so? You'll not meet my level of burden, so you remain wackjob until you meet my requirements. Is that fair?
&gt;All because Kennedy Gondwe chose to get circumcised to protect himself from AIDS, and took the British Broadcasting Corp.'s radio and Web audience through the procedure with him Friday. Kudos to him for his efforts to make a unique contribution to AIDS prevention, but still - a circumcision *on radio*? What would the typical redditers say: - "Pics or it didn't happen" - Reporter sacrificies foreskin live on the web -- film at 11! 
I love how they say several times how that's not "fair and balanced."  As if others have to live up to the high standards of Faux News.
What if all media outlets were cooperatively owned, then there wouldn't be one person in control of the squelch nob.
Lousy ratings, basically. In fairness, though, Fox DID give it three (sort of) seasons...
It makes sense in its own way. Even today's suicide bombers are promised scores of virgins. Anyone who knows anything about western culture today would define a virgin as a girl fourteen or under. What's the chance of finding one older? And we all live in and are immersed in a blatantly pedophilic culture. Children are sexualized early and parents and commercial enterprises compete to outdo each other in age-inappropriate dress and activity for our young. 
great news...
this are the links to a very cool video. Alex Mandossian talks about how he took his annual income into his monthly income using a phone, mouth and a message. His other site is http://www.taketeleseminarsecrets.com He talks about how to teleseminar, teleseminar basics, teleseminar secrets, teleseminar com and internet marketing. 
Because, like every other candidate, Ron Paul has to provide documentation for all those collected funds with the Federal Election Commission? So they're at least as true as any of the other candidates funding reports (granted, that's not saying much.)  Of course, you're probably just living up to your nick...
this is just spam for a site covered in porno ads. 
Of course not. I know the internet better than that. 
1400 years ago it was stated in the Quran (Koran, the book of Islam) that angels travel in one day the same distance that the moon travels in 1000 lunar years, that is, 12000 Lunar Orbits / Earth Day. Outside gravitational fields 12000 Lunar Orbits / Earth Day turned out to be the known speed of light!  http://www.speed-light.info/angels_speed_of_light.htm
I'll hit it...   with a woman's rights bill. 
Every other source I've looked at says that the endura was not common, and generally not practiced until one was close to death. Hell, most Cathars didn't even observe most of the code of conduct; that was for Perfecti, people who had devoted their lives to Catharism.  Catharism did not *condemn* suicide, but neither was it some mass suicide cult. If it was, the Church wouldn't have needed to get off their corrupt asses and do anything: they could just wait for the Cathars to do that "customary" suicide!  And now, the rest of the paragraph you partially quoted:  &gt; Generation was abhorred by the Albigenses even in the animal kingdom. Consequently, abstention from all animal food, except fish, was enjoined. Their belief in metempsychosis, or the transmigration of souls, the result of their logical rejection of purgatory, furnishes another explanation for the same abstinence. To this practice they added long and rigorous fasts. The necessity of absolute fidelity to the sect was strongly inculcated. **War and capital punishment were absolutely condemned.**  So, yes, a lot more peaceful than the Church that went and slaughtered them. And then set up an inquisition to deal with any they hadn't killed.
You say that like it's a new thing.
You know, that particular teaching of Jesus really really bothers me; it's almost like he stumbled on Godel's Incompleteness some 2000 years before (reputedly, Buddha Gautama also taught the same message).
Wow, additional proof that anything Opera can do, FireFox can do later, uglier &amp; slower.
I bet Ron Paul had something to do with this.  I also believe TRUTHERS are the only ones who can find out what *really* happened.
Yeah, it's really just incredibly infuriating when this happens.  Do you *really* think you're the first person to report that shit? No, of course you're just hoping to slag some karma off the first submission.
They are using the same design on gloucester road in London.  Walk past it on the few days that I actually go to the office (I normally work from home).
Ron Paul now for all the right reasons. Let's help bring about the republic Thomas Jefferson envisioned. Down with the Hamiltonian Empire, hungry for power and glory. Down with worthless fiat currency. Let's bring back sound money as prescribed in the US Constitution!!   While we're at it, there is another issue that should have everyone's attention. SB1959 (Violent Radicalization and Homegrown Terrorism Prevention Act of 2007)- The most evil, pernicious bit of legislation to come down the pike yet. This bill potentially allows government functionaries to declare any US citizen, ANY ONE OF US, an "enemy of the State." This reprehensible bill will end democracy, end free speech, and punish innocent protesters, religious groups, environmental groups, animal protection groups, gun groups, and so on. This bill rolls the thought police, Stalin, and Hitler all into one. The bill is in Committee (Senate Committee on Homeland Security and Governmental Affairs).  Here is the link to the site showing who's on the committee. http://hsgac.senate.gov/index.cfm?Fuseaction=About.Membership  Call their offices, beg them, plead with them, tell them in no uncertain terms that this idiotic bill MUST DIE IN COMMITTEE.  It cannot come to the Senate floor.  Call your own Senators and tell them to lobby to kill this bill.  Do it ASAP.  This bill makes the PATRIOT ACT look like milk and cookie time.  Peace and Democracy NOW.
Yes. 
The book was published in 1993.   Back then it might have been impressive.  Today, not quite so much.
Nope, as long as you're the one submitting the legitimate file, you can modify it all you want before submitting.
They all have ESP and don't need it.
There are some good arguments that certain governmental functions should be consistent between all parts of a country to be effective: the military, for instance.
I *like* those little zaps.  They're fun.
And bats. This is bat country.
We'll have a lot of lead time in the next ramp up to war.  We'll see how the UN sanctions play out.  Ironically, the lack of success at Annapolis indicates that Arab states may be less inclined to support an attack on Iran.  It pinched Israel to choose which is the greater enemy, a Iran with homegrown nuclear power, or an independent Palestinian state.  Apparently, Israel feels that an independent Palestinian state is more of a threat.
There's a book about Harry Potter?
This makes me wonder if racism isn't made up like the holocaust.  White people and black people appeared to be living in harmony there.
I thought it was going to be a Richard Dawkins blow up doll.
The writer who uses the pseudonym, for obvious reasons, is a Persian ex-Muslim. I dunno maybe there is a belief that Persian critics of Islam have it out for Arabs. 
It is to us!
Anyone know if the old dedicated keyboards for APL would count as prior art?
Eye-opening look at the burgeoning business of 'medical dispensaries' in California.
No one is really bothered by the boogy man as long as he stays in the closet. =)
Shut up! You're ruining it for everyone!
The two fractured arms and countless bumps, scrapes and scars of my youth salute you.
Yes! dear lord has that been pissing me of for sometime. Its just so redundant, more so than my post. 
Does making up by excessive fapping counts? 
LINK PLAZ KTHX
Poignant.
Ahhhhh, no, I think it would be AIDS that ended the party. That, and enforcement of drunk driving laws, did more to quiet things down than Craigslist hook-ups did, long before the internet was widely known. If anything, there is more public debauchery and partying now in the Castro than in the mid-90's.
When I was fourteen in California in 1971 I was protesting the Vietnam War against my parents' wishes.  Ratzinger was old enough to know better when he joined the Hitler Youth. Fucking racist is what he is now and always has been.
True.  But who says religion can't change?  Conservative Judaism is all about merging tradition and modernity.
&gt; family tradition. Hereditary stupidity. Yeah, that really redeems it. &gt; back when So their stupidity is not terminal, it's just overwhelming. Come on, you have to be pretty fucking stupid to believe there's even one speck of unalloyed goodness in the USA. We are talking about people who believe being subject to 1) verbal and physical abuse, 2) having to murder random people, and 3) PTSD, are acceptable costs in exchange for whatever shitty thing the US Army sells you.  IOW, we are talking about brain-damaged idiots. This is why I don't bring up brain-damage by IEDs. I mean, who can tell the difference? By the way, I wouldn't consider *even one* of those things to be worth a million dollars, let alone the pig swill the US Army feeds you. Yes, I'd murder a capitalist for 10$ but not a random person for a million bucks; totally different thing.
I wrote it previously, it seemed to be partially relevant.  Yes, working as a means to survival is indeed slavery.  A free man today has no more choice than a slave in that they must work or die.  While I did gloss over the idea that criminalizing prostitution won't fix the problem, I think its pretty much implied that since prostitution is caused by a flawed paradigm, making changes within the paradigm will not fix the problem (only a drastic gestalt shift can fix the problem).
If you care more than I do, feel free to follow the citations.  While hardly authoritative, wikipedia does a decent job of identifying its sources, at least on significant topics.  Also, I don't actually care; it just seemed improbable that the issue was actually this cut-and-dried.
Schwinn Stingray? Leaping over things? That was me. (Could swear I'd be able to leap 20 cars if I could JUST GET MORE SPEED.)
Yes, silly, but they're not a single entity, and make big mistakes -- but are so big that they can still be there afterwards. It's still loss. They're not going to ride the wave like a surfer, but they'll probably still be standing. 
In case anybody doesn't get the joke, [here's a link to SBCL](http://sbcl.sourceforge.net/).
No, all I see is a bunch of giant books.  What's up with that?
Yes, not only that, but I'll be damned if there aren't 7 of them. 
Forgot Neo-Atheism...
Dan Brown is awesome, I love DaVinci Code!
My feeling is as follows:  Who gives a f*ck.  If someone wants to writing 'breaking', let them.  Vote it down if you don't like it.  In my humble opinion, the content should be way more important than how someone writes the title.  I believe the writing of the title falls under creative license. 
I think we need Keanu Reeve to say "Whooa" for this post.
Perhaps if the story was discussed at a religious site, they would call her a sinner and said she deserved what she got.
&gt;A Boston-based company has filed a claim in Nigeria - one of the countries where the laptops were due to be distributed - alleging that the OLPC has infringed a patent it holds on a 'four shift key' keyboard Just great - someone has been granted a patent on *multiple shift keys*? Let's have a look: Alt, Shift, Control, Windows, Compose, Meta - hey, somebody call the lawyers! Seriously: just how long have typewriters and computer keyboards been around? Certainly several times the period a patent is valid. 
One of the cutest things about ARM is the conditional execution of instructions, meant to cut down on pipeline stalls from branch prediction misses, but it looks like it's made for compilers or people who have too much time on their hands.
He'd better not have been fired for a negative review. If he was, Eidos should be boycotted.
minix -&gt; tamu -&gt; slackware -&gt; os2 -&gt; windows, windows, windows, and more windows -&gt; osx  looking at ubuntu now...
No, such changes can only be brought about by a huge shift away from a patriarchal social structure.
I'm surprised my mom and dad weren't there, but then I expect to find the racier photos my mom's hidden after she's gone.   they had it great, too. they did all kinds of drugs, drove a rolls, went to auto auctions in Vegas with twenty grand and a gun with the serial numbers acid burned off and came back with the coolest cars, and partied nonstop in the desert. it is a sad day when you realize your parents were much cooler than you can ever hope to be.
But why is he mentioning atheism at all? To imply, of course, that people who don't believe in God exist in the sort of moral vacuum that leads to permissiveness and evil. The thing is, there's no evidence to support this belief. It's completely subjective and is ultimately tantamount to saying "People like me are good, people unlike me are bad." It's so illogical and fuzzy and circular that even refuting it feels like a waste of time, but is fortunately so easy that little time needs to be wasted.
 If someone wants to write 'breaking' in the title, they should writing 'breaking'.  Vote it down if you don't like it.   In my humble opinion, the content should be way more important than how someone writes the title. I believe the writing of the title falls under creative license, even if the use of 'breaking' isn't creative in the slightest.
Thanks for linking to the print version. I love to read Greenwald but I hate visiting the pop-up &amp; ad-heavy regular Salon website.
Just booked a Verizon commercial, sold a six episode deal to the web and booked a stand up tour.  So, thanks.  And I'll tell my wife, a doctor at UCLA, that you send your regards.
and john doe. and Lex Luthor
I didn't apologize to you, whiteboy.
heart!
It does.
Upmodded for the use of 'BREAKING'
I am all for this. Please release it.
If you want to save Darfur, then by all means, get off your ass and do it.  MY tax dollars should be spent improving the lot of MY fellow Americans.  
you can be a misogynistic atheist asshole, and still believe in karma
She could bargain her way out of prison if she told the government how her time machine works.
I'll tell you how, lots of money and lots of support.  He's got both right now, and that movement grows every day.  He's our best shot out of this fucking mess we're in, so let's just give it our best effort.
That's a spectacular photograph. :)
My, what a big penis you must have. [consults wikipedia] Yes, by all reckoning, huge, HUGE to name so many esoteric terms.
As long as the facts are true, then knowing that a candidate does crap like this is useful information.  When you can't tell whether the facts are true or not, then the analysis gets irritating.
The problem is, the DX10 picture is when the tide is out and the DX9 pic is when the water is up on the beach.
"'I just want kids to enjoy their innocence and their time of growing up,'' Jeff Issa said, explaining his persistence. ''Let them be kids and not worry about homosexuality, race, religion. Just let them live freely as kids.''"  But it is because children are innocent that they won't worry about homosexuality. Curiosity shouldn't be confused with worry. 
Has everybody seen the video about it?  &lt;object width="425" height="355"&gt;&lt;param name="movie" value="http://www.youtube.com/v/NxNEFZWgr0M&amp;rel=1"&gt;&lt;/param&gt;&lt;param name="wmode" value="transparent"&gt;&lt;/param&gt;&lt;embed src="http://www.youtube.com/v/NxNEFZWgr0M&amp;rel=1" type="application/x-shockwave-flash" wmode="transparent" width="425" height="355"&gt;&lt;/embed&gt;&lt;/object&gt;
enter a comment here
The blurring of evolutionary theory with free market capitalism has been the intellectual underpinning of Western society in modern times, with many scientists throwing their hat into the social sciences arena to offer opinions on human society.
&gt;but it also needs an army of volunteers willing to go door-to-door in the New England winter.  I grew up in Upstate NY, and I'm going to NH for Ron Paul. Just give me some Dunkin Donuts coffee and I'll be on my way. 
You know, most Republicans think Reagan *was* like you think Ron Paul is *now*.
my god, assuming an othrological projection, that thing is 5 times the mass of earth.
Sounds like the shopping list of an Easton-Ellis character..!
Photoshopped!
Please don't be foolish.  My original assertion was that they both have issues and  that you do not work in a Mac-only workplace where you would hear all the possible things that could go wrong. I've been reluctant to go to Leopard with my Mini.  I like Tiger, and don't think I would get $100 of value for an upgrade.  The fact that people seem to be having issues is enough for me to stay away from it for some time. I'm sure it's fine, but it's not a priority for me to change. Same way that most people feel about Vista.  They made XP/Tiger really good, so people are reluctant to abandon it.  The fact that you've had a couple issues with Vista doesn't make it a bad OS for everyone.  In fact it seems like most of the complaints are due to at work computers/networking, and not home desktops.  
I hate to be a downer but according to Carlin's logic, you still don't have a right to complain because the fact that you voted means you approve of the system enough to participate in it. Carlin can sit back and watch the whole thing collapse while laughing at everyone who thinks their vote is getting counted.   As far as government is concerned, backwards is the best direction to go. Ultimately, people just need to learn to get along. A government is a symbol for everything you can't agree on. Thus, according my logic, the bigger the government more everyone must disagree. Ron Paul wants to go backwards the farthest, so he would be my favorite pick.
All lies are equal but some lies are more equal than others. To the MSM it just depends on if they agree with the liars agenda.   "I believe it is appropriate to have an overrepresentation of factual presentations on how dangerous it is, as a predicate for opening up the audience to listen to what the solutions are," Gore said in the May 9, 2006, issue of Grist magazine.  Overrepresentation = misrepresentation = lie
Hypothesis: At least one soldier, probably a decent number, have falsely confessed to being gay to get out of Iraq.  Anyone have an idea how to test that?
If you'll notice, there's spunk on the picture where the female is assuming the blow job position. Some one was getting enjoyment out of these pictures long before us at Reddit ever could.
our cosmic footprint
WORD!  internerds to the rescue  :)
If you're in DC on Friday, I look forward to seeing you, and hey, if you want any hard booze, I'll buy you a drink.  EDIT: I know the karma-whoring folks will KILL me for this, but with Mr. Splashy Pants, a Ron Paul Blimp, and helping some poor lady go on the cruise of her dreams, I had to say something.  Again, I look forward to saying it more, continue to:  Go Team Internet! (I may need to change that to Team Reddit soon.)
This is video, not a picture.  I do not have time for videos.  I did have time to type this though.
bind oil to pullulan, the same carbohydrate gel that Listermint uses for its strips.   WANT!!!!
He seems to think it's "obviously" silly that an AK could be used for self-defense, that the second amendment is about overthrowing the federal government, or even that people should be responsible for their own actions.  Then again, he might be parodying that point of view.  The text gets more and more dense and I couldn't even make it all the way through the four pages.  "Brevity is the soul of wit," and by that measure this is witless.
That's the crowed to you, sir. 
My keyboard was made in Australia.  http://www.revfad.com/flip.html
Unfortunately Zero Punctuation hasn't reviewed practically every game available commercially in the last say... 17 years. It's bloody funny though :D
Also "Best/Worst INSERT KEY WORD HERE Ever".
Seconded.
Extremely counter-productive. for the following reasons:  * The RNC does not care. It's not like they are big fans of democracy anyways. * Attempting to disrupt the convention feeds into their persecution complex. * Republicans enjoy stories of beat-up protesters. They find the pain of others funny. * Republicans know how to deal with people who sneak past the security: They wave placards and chant "4 moar years!" till the cameras go away.
&gt; Since the theory of race has been disproven, the definition of race has morphed into nothing more than a group of people.  You might want to see [ethnic group](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Ethnic_group)
How do you know he's white, racist?
so ironic
Somewhere in the middle of paragraph 42:  &gt; If in the face of this world's suffering, protest against God is understandable, **the claim that humanity can and must do what no God actually does or is able to do** is both presumptuous and intrinsically false. It is no accident that this idea has led to the greatest forms of cruelty and violations of justice; rather, it is grounded in the intrinsic falsity of the claim  (emphasis mine) Atheism.  Or more accurately perhaps humanism?  Incidentally, I can't find a place where he defends his effective statement that "atheism is intrinsically false"; can anyone find it?
&gt;the definition of race has morphed into nothing more than a group of people.  No, it hasn't.  It refers to groups of people who share a common ancestry. &gt;So hating on a group of people is racist.  By your logic, hating fat people, or left-handed people, or people who like to watch American Idol would be racist.  Of course, that's absurd, and no one anywhere would claim those things to be racist, therefor, by reductio ad absurdum, your definition is false, and being against a particular religion cannot be racism.
damn, beaten kinda
It's not a meme you can get into. "You've been Rick Rolled!" OK, move on, no laughing zone.
really? i was just thinking to myself "look, the token black guy"
Unfortunately it requires something with a little more kick. Plutonium!
There are sunspots coming around on the far left.
But wouldn't it be something if they did?  http://www.thepaincomics.com/weekly060215.htm  (Ok, so that's scientists, not atheists; still funny).
That's remarkably big. 
Vas ist das?
Huh. This might actually be useful. Umm, what's TSS?
Holy crap... what were you running on in those days?
&gt; Different markets demand different architectures.  Why is that? I have some guesses, but I'd like to hear from someone who knows.
Baaaaaaaaaaandwagon, sorry man.
actually you got my point exactly right. I agree with you that a Rockefeller Republican would be a more moderate type of republican, but thats not the type I was implying.  Ron Paul associates himself to a Reagen style republican. Its hard to peg this down to to a name, but the closest that I can come to (looking through wikipedia) is a [Paleoconservatist](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Paleoconservatism). Its a social conservative, foreign non-interventionist and fiscal conservative. Jefferson himself was this type of politician and if you want you could just call it an anti-federalist.  The current Republican party breaks this tradition with the neo-con agenda and doesn't embrace any of these conservative issues. Its like they are just greedy bastards.  So my point is that changing the Republican party back to a Jeffersonian model is not moderating it. Nothing in it is progressive or liberal. The criticism I can see you saying though is that this will never happen, which I think remains to be seen. In principle Ron Paul supporters as these kind of republicans.
no fucking thanks, I prefer to keep the insurance I currently have.
At the "Office of living assholes &amp; dead martyrs"
Yep. This is an obvious piece of evidence that government and corporate interests have begun to merge.
&gt;Anyone who knows anything about western culture today would define a virgin as a girl fourteen or under.   No, they would define a virgin as a person who has never had sex.  Remember that we're talking about promises of what awaits in heaven.  Western norms of sexual activity are irrelevant.
My birthday?
It takes a fairly small-minded person to downvote a story simply because of the word 'breaking.' 
Not a lot of controversy:  &gt;...majority of scholars accept the traditional account of Aisha being married at the age of nine. Some respond to criticism of the young marriage by arguing that she had reached puberty by then,[22] while others argue that she was older than nine at marriage.  Edit: OOps
or muscle
There's more than one black dude in these pictures.  But they probably all look the same to you anyway, right?
Unreal did indeed support basic procedural textures. The same thing is accomplised these days with pixel shaders.  Check the forcefield and water effects in Unreal.
tell me about it
Maybe we *can* make a difference...
&gt; your parents were crazier than you ever give them credit for  I can assure you my parents never partied like this.
Yes, that totally explains projects like SQLite. Or libjpeg. Or libpng. Or zlib.
So hack it. Upload the last image first, then everything else in order. Then the entire thing would be in reverse order. Or upload them in reverse order, so it would show correctly, though that takes more time.
"This country needs a black man that little white kids can look up to, like I had when I was young, and a white man that little black kids can look up to. That way, maybe we'd have fewer of these racial problems."  "If I don't make it across, and I hit that canyon wall, I'm just gonna get somewhere quicker where you are ALL going some day. And I'm gonna sit there and have a beer... and wait for ya."  "I want to go to a Heaven, as a young man in the prime of my life, where there's a motorcycle jump I can make every day and never miss, a golf course where I can par every day and get some birdies and not miss any putts, where there are a lot of good-looking broads, no state tax, no federal tax, and no politicians!"  I don't think anyone has uttered anything more manly than this...  RIP
Kennedy's warning:  Mary Jo, get out of the car - quick!
Perhaps he just found that _one_ nine-year-old SUPER hot?  Still gross, really.  Further, he'd have to have recognized hotness potential in a girl of six.
I'm going to draw this on a whiteboard at work and pass it off as my own idea.  Everyone will think I'm hilarious!
MIPS also has the advantage of being very widely understood: the textbooks by [Hennessey and Patterson](http://www.amazon.com/Computer-Architecture-Quantitative-Approach-Kaufmann/dp/1558605967) explain MIPS thoroughly as an in-depth example. It's a pretty sweet design; there was obviously a lot of polish put on the instruction set by good CPU implementors.
That's a little disingenous, don't you think?  Successful exploitation of the qmail bug allows execution of arbitrary code, but only affects 64-bit systems with about 10GB of virtual memory and *no* resource limits.  In contrast, postfix installs have had "portable" anonymous message destruction, unauthorized (often anonymous) relaying (via ipv6), and *all the security vulnerabilities of procmail*.  While you can cook up a system that is affected by the qmail bug, it's not the norm, and it wouldn't be done by any competent admin, but the postfix ones could and have happened to everyone.
why don't they arrest the folk that are stupid enough to have those bots on their computers; they are the real threat to society. 
I wasn't aware that was still possible.
In and of itself, people who get irritated by seeing too much of the same thing.  When it's used for things that are not in any conceivable way breaking news, those of us who like words to be used correctly.  I had no problem with "Breaking: Thai coup" last year, when the thread itself was a constant source of new details.  I don't think there's a lot new to come out after Evel Knieval is already dead.  I would object on the same basis to labeling a banana "Vegetable."
"(Allah) Rules the cosmic affair from the heavens to the Earth. Then this affair travels to Him a distance in one day, at a measure of one thousand years of what you count."  Look at that verse (from the page you linked) and at the contrived 10,000 word apologetics that follows. To go from that verse to the speed of light is such a stretch that the whole page is about to snap.
&gt;If technical progress is not matched by corresponding progress in man's ethical formation, in man's inner growth, then it is not progress at all, but a threat for man and for the world.  Is it just me, or is this more of an argument _against_ the tradition-based, out of touch with modern life, irrelevent religion that he heads?
One of the special powers unwhite people have is the ability to detect when we're dealing with a white person over the internet.  For example, I know you're white.  Only a white person would question my ability to detect whiteness, because all the unwhite people already detected it.
I remember when it was "Breaking - Evil Knievil breaks more bones."
I loved Falcon MC. Was that the very first Falcon release? I played the shit out of the Mac version back when they were all monochrome.
No context. Downvoted.
Ummm it all still goes on... with the right invite. The internet allows so much better controlled parties
Ummm, whatever you say.
By Cindy Loose Washington Post Staff Writer **Sunday, December 2, 2007**; Page P01  *The future, Conan?*
&gt; It's no different than if you wrote an original program and released it under whatever license you wanted.  Yes, it is *very different*. Because you are *denying* those improvements to the original creator of the program. You're essentially saying that your license politics are more important to you than all the work he did to create the project in the first place, and he should just go fuck himself. It is extremely ungrateful and disrespectful.
And a big hate-on for brakes.  It could be a childhood-related reflex, of one who had one too many things broken.  
I can assure you my kids will never know all the shit I did.
http://skepdic.com/confirmbias.html
English.  Do you speak it?  Site also includes Wonka Javascript malware
Servers can't just link up to a network. It requires extensive server configuration on the part of the server attempting to link up, and the servers it's attempting to link to. Allowing any server to link into a network would be a security nightmare.
...and he's a practical joker.
That's what I was thinking/hoping.  They had a chance to look like the good guys just in time for christmas but looks like they blew it.  I hope she goes on a different cruise-liner. 
I assure you, x86 is ugly from a EE standpoint. The standard textbook description is that x86 is **"difficult to explain and impossible to love"**. Yes, I'm quoting verbatim from a standard textbook.
Then the Love-Fest began....  Any similarities to an abusive relationship, you think?
Damn, too late, I'm already 24!
It's so sad. He was only 69. A man who always took so much care of his health.
The dress and hairstyles of the human figures, and the architecture of castles in the diagrams are all typically European, from some time between 1450 and 1520.
because they work for geek squad.  Then they get fired and whine on the internets about losing a shitty job.
Right, you think I'm being naive, but my parents did not grow up in America during the freewheeling 60's, okay?  But I do agree with you, my kids will never know the kind of retarded shit I engage in.
Me too, assuming their girlfriend was ugly.
Thats not extreme, I agree with you in this analysis. You're absolutely right. I think everyone recognizes this and its why his campaign slogan is "revolution".  Lets assume for a minute though that he does indeed win the republican nomination. Wouldn't you consider voting for him? You have probably a million reasons to declare him "batshit" or something, but just assume he wins. Wouldn't there be a revolution with citizens coming out of the woodwork in support of this crazy old man?
You've never seen Larry Clark's stuff.  'They met a girl on acid in Bryant Park at 6 am and took her home, Tulsa, 1980'  http://www.sexblo.gs/img/0ametwager.jpg  nws, durr
Excellent.  There is the LOLBible. Can we haz teh LOLKoran?
welcome to the internets. Don't tell us what you think; we've already thought it for you.
I see your point, but I don't think anything Milton Friedman (my main influence for libertarianism) was meant to be a manifesto, but a guide, in that smaller government usually happens to be desireable, but isn't always so. I consider myself libertarian, but I'm not opposed to reality. Even Adam Smith noted there were a lot of good uses for government, and I don't disagree. I just think we should focus on them and skip over the pork, the mil-indus complex and a bunch of other nonsense.   Anyways, both Libertarians and Progressives oppose elite power; Libertarians call it "Big Government" and Progressives call it "Big Business". If we could get together, compromise a little, it would be a long lasting political realignment. I would say dissatisfaction in both the Republican and Democratic base could do this.   I extend my hand to you sir. 
A lot of studies are performed just to confirm "common sense" - and there's nothing wrong with that.  Science is useful.
beating the shit out of someone with your arms in casts should be easy, it is almost like having two bats connected to your arms.
People were a lot uglier in the 60's.
He's made predictions that didn't pan out before:  http://blogs.law.harvard.edu/dowbrigade/2005/02/21/ritter-predicts-june-attack/
LOL your username
Exaggeration, on the other hand, is very much alive.
Mike Huckabee:   Supports and will continue TORTURE of detainees.  At 8:30, Colmes asked Huckabee if he, as President, would use torture to extract intelligence about an imminent terrorist attack on America. In the process, he made the point that John McCain says that accurate information cannot be extracted by torture. Huckabee countered that point by claiming, "we have received good solid information from individuals from doing things of the nature you're describing" http://www.foxnews.com/story/0,2933,295883,00.html http://progressivezone.blogspot.com/2007/09/governor-mike-huckabee-claims-knowledge.html  Says he is for lower taxes, but INCREASED state spending 65.3 percent (1996-2004) and supported five tax increases. Taxes were raised twenty-one times for an increase of $883 million dollars. Arkansas' general debt shot up by almost $1 billion. http://www.nwanews.com/adg/national/203850/ http://article.nationalreview.com/?q=NmNjMmI1ODhjNGVlZWFmNTlmMGNiZTVjYTg1NTUzMTk=  Supports the War in Iraq, the troop surge and the continued operation of the Guantanamo Bay detention camp. http://senate.ontheissues.org/Mike_Huckabee.htm  Opposes the medical use of marijuana, and said he would continue to RAID, ARREST, PROSECUTE, and IMPRISON patients who are using marijuana as a medicine.  http://granitestaters.com/candidates/mike_huckabee.html  Vowed to Sign a Nationwide SMOKING BAN in public places. http://blogs.usatoday.com/onpolitics/2007/08/huckabee-says-h.html  Wants to give driver's licenses to illegal aliens. http://arkjournal.com/2007/11/newsflash-mike-huckabee-supported-bill.html  Grabbed national headlines with a governor's intervention that year to block the state from paying $419 for a retarded 15-year-old girl's abortion, her pregnancy stemming from being raped by her stepfather on a camping trip. http://findarticles.com/p/articles/mi_hb5244/is_199608/ai_n20976416  Huckabee secured the realease of a convicted rapist name Dumond who then raped and killed again. - http://www.arktimes.com/Articles/ArticleViewer.aspx?ArticleID=154e1aad-fd18-4efd-8d80-b5dab8559419  Believes in Creationism. http://www.ncseweb.org/resources/rncse_content/vol25/8118_is_evolution_arkansas39s_h_12_30_1899.asp  Ordered the destruction of tapes and hard drives containing embarassing information. Early in Huckabee's term as governor, documents, e-mails and memos stored on hard drives just like the ones that were destroyed formed the basis of embarrassing stories about Huckabee, including a 1998 story in the Arkansas Times detailing how Huckabee and his family were using the $60,000-a-year Governor's Mansion fund as their personal piggy bank. http://www.arktimes.com/Articles/ArticleViewer.aspx?ArticleID=29b3f942-6cd2-4e6f-984a-61dbfba5bf42  It's not suprising that he opposes Campaign Finance Reform: http://www.q-and-a.org/Transcript/?ProgramID=1010&amp;QueryText=Huckabee  Huckabee is against same-sex marriage and civil unions. He outlawed same-sex marriage in Arkansas. http://www.ontheissues.org/Mike_Huckabee.htm  Huckabee seems to love loot and has a dismissive attitude toward ethics, campaign finance rules and propriety in general:  In the 1992 contest, Huckabee used campaign funds to pay himself as his own media consultant. Other payments went to the family babysitter.  In his successful 1994 run for lieutenant governor, he set up a nonprofit curtain known as Action America so he could give speeches for money without having to disclose the names of his benefactors. He failed to report that campaign travel payments were for the use of his own personal plane.  After he became governor in 1996, he raked in tens of thousands of dollars in gifts, including gifts from people he later appointed to prestigious state commissions.   He converted a governor's mansion operating account into a personal expense account, claiming public money for a doghouse, dry-cleaning bills, panty hose and meals at Taco Bell. He tried to claim $70,000 in furnishings provided by a wealthy cotton grower for the private part of the residence as his own, until he learned ethics rules prevented it. When a disgruntled former employee disclosed memos revealing all this, the Huckabee camp shut her up by repeatedly suggesting she might be vulnerable to prosecution for theft because she'd shared documents generated by the state's highest official.  Inauguration funds were used to buy clothing for his wife. He once took control of the state Republican Party's campaign account -- then swore the account had been somebody else's responsibility when it ran afoul of federal election laws.  He sped final action on a bill to allow video poker at the state's racetracks, an act followed not long afterward by a $10,000 campaign contribution from the owner of the state's biggest race track,. http://www.salon.com/opinion/feature/2007/11/13/huckabee/?source=whitelist   Read More: Political Positions - http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Political_positions_of_Mike_Huckabee The dark side of Mike Huckabee - http://www.salon.com/opinion/feature/2007/11/13/huckabee/
Mohammed gave us frequent handwashing.  I'm pretty sure that's the only useful thing a prophet ever did.
hey, that's pretty much still par for the course still. Just brighter colours and less polka dots.
Bullshit, do you have any idea how long and how many cells it would take just to fuel a plane? Thats assuming hydrogen was suitable for aviation.  Even assuming you could do that, the fact is our planes run on aviation fuel. We realistically need a similar fuel - algae can be that fuel, solar cannot.
Silly muslim, you don't have a pig.  Do you really think she should be murdered by that band of animals? 
Now it all makes sense!  Pedobear is Muhammad!
Suckers! I see through your downvotes. You love Hillary. She'll never fade. 
If Suze Orman is a man, he should be allowed to get a gay marriage to Ann Coulter.
the way you talk to people, it doesn't sound as if you recognize them as persons.
In other words, keep this search in mind despite it having gone off reddit's front page, and continue clicking away throughout the campaign.
Lazy is doing things that other people don't regard as useful to them.  Anyone who actually manages to sit around and do nothing commands my total respect.  It's really not easy by any stretch.
Worth half a million more votes, in fact.
Maybe the brake to his bicycle broke, causing him to crash into a wall or something when he was 6.  
I don't really give a shit, to be honest. What riles me more than anything is when someone thinks one of these sociopathic powermongers is better or worse because of the letter after his name, or whether he gives a stump speech that makes you feel good.
I don't understand how reporters can be so into their work that they would risk being killed for it.  I even work at a news station.  If they asked me to go to a dangerous place to report, I would laugh and say "Are you kidding me?  Hell no."
This is true.  SHA-256 is very strong, and the source code is available everywhere on the Net. Any good hash library should have the entire SHA family in it.
no, it just makes it not news.
I think in this case, what they need is a bit more testicular fortitude.  Seriously, the manager sat in a closet with some douchebag berating him for two and a half hours without telling him to shove it and walking out?  
Jesus was gay?  Far out.  How do you figure?  
Christian baptism is indelible and Muslim apostates forfeit their right to live, correct?   I believe you're confusing culture with creed.
Best game ever. Ever ever ever.
It's like Reddit for porn: you get to download what other people liked enough to keep, at sneakernet speeds.
Take it like a man, wimp.
We shall see
BREAKING: Yes, I do. 
Thousands of Muslims have demonstrated to demand killing a teacher for calling a teddy bear Muhammad. I've yet to see thousands of christians demonstrating to demand killing gay people.
&gt; For my part, while I am as convinced a Socialist as the most ardent Marxian, I do not regard Socialism as a gospel of proletarian revenge, nor even, primarily, as a means of securing economic justice. I regard it primarily as an adjustment to machine production demanded by considerations of common sense, and calculated to increase the happiness, not only of proletarians, but of all except a tiny minority of the human race. If it cannot now be realized without a violent upheaval, this to be attributed largely to the violence of its advocates. But I still have some hope that a saner advocacy may soften the opposition, and make a less catastrophic transition possible.
LOL like white people will ever believe that.
Is it true that if you don't use it, you lose it? 
read the customer reviews:  http://www.amazon.com/review/product/B000BOR01W/ref=dp_top_cm_cr_acr_txt?%5Fencoding=UTF8&amp;showViewpoints=1  one of these things, are not like the other...
Toxic Shock Syndrome. It's a sort of bacterial infection that can result from leaving a tampon in too long. It's really rare nowadays, but I didn't know that when I was a kid going OH GOD FRIGHTENING AND POTENTIALLY FATAL DISEASE. There's usually warnings about it on the back of every tampon box.
How many people, who say that "illegal aliens are doing the jobs Americans won't do", realize they are advocating and supporting the exploitation of those workers? If an American won't do the job for the pay that's offered then why should an illegal settle for that same pay or even less?
Fake it until you make it man. Everyone has doubts, you just gotta put up that front and act confident. Soon you will be.   But lifting weights and getting a job doesn't hurt. 
I almost forgot what an eloquent, rational and reasonable leader sounded like.
The mullahs want to throw stones and the pope wants to embrace them, but, each in their own ignorance, cannot condone the use of condoms, thus handing out their own form of destruction.  
40.
I'm confident you just raped this thread. 
haha you're just a troll
I should have worded my intent a little more clearly.  I agree that for most people the origin of our species is inconsequential.  By this same measure of disregard, some people who answer these polls agreeing with the religious viewpoint are simply voicing answers that are comforting, readily available and currently accepted socially.  Not all of them mind you, as one needs merely to look at fundamentalism, where stringent belief is the only option. I have noticed when talking with religious family and friends that at some point in the conversation when a particular point is made (it varies, depending on the topic and how the conversation started), the reaction is the equivelant of sticking ones fingers in ones ears, closing the eyes and humming a comforting tune.  Some people just don't want to think about these things, and any penetration of their comfort bubble puts them on the defensive. It is only a natural progression that as science has been able to explain away myths, acts and phenomena formerly attributed to "God," that religion begins to play a less reliable and, to some extent, token part if people's lives.  What bugs me is that as far as we've come, there are so many people ready to accept such easy 'answers' merely because they're afraid to stop and think about existence, science, etc.  I try my best not to come off as uppity, or looking down on religious people because I once was one (granted, I had little choice in the matter).  Non-theists of any stripe should not only stress the negative impact religion has on people's lives (something many prominent figures do a wonderful job of), but also do their best to welcome others into the non-believing fold.  This seems to me to be one of the main failings of militant atheists, though I can certainly understand the anger and emotion when one sees the atrocities, human rights violations and widespread corruption present in religion as a whole. Sorry to be so long-winded, but I hope that clarifies my point somewhat (though I fear I probably muddied it in the process, as well).
What did the blimp do to you?  It's ok, you can tell us. 
racist your username
Are - are you sure you are in the right post?
A man with confidence rapes another man?
LINK PLAZ KTHX
These actions show a lot of things very clearly. Let's just lay out the facts.  A lot of people don't trust Hillary Clinton nor want her as their president. This is illustrated by   A. A dude strapped a bomb to his chest. B. A lot of people online weren't sympathetic. C. Many others were skeptical and even outright denied the situation.
The smaller footprint due to lack of suburban sprawl is only the tip of the iceberg. A train has about 1/6th the footprint of an equivalent-sized highway IIRC.
[Deer Rear?](http://www.amazon.com/BRAND-NOT-SPECIFIED-Deer-Rear/dp/B0006M4WR4/ref=tag_tdp_sv_edpp_i)
I don't think this is karma-whorish at all.  This *has* been a pretty kickass week on the internet, now that you point it out that way.
Apottedficus, Go tohttp://beinecke.library.yale.edu/dl_crosscollex/brbldl/oneITEM.asp?pid=2002046&amp;iid=1006219&amp;srchtype=ITEM for the page with what clearly is a three-banded armadillo. You'll find it on the left hand margin near the top. If you have problems with that link go to http://beinecke.library.yale.edu/dl_crosscollex/ type in voynich  and click on all images  go to page 8, 2nd row 2nd image #1006219  Compare with this image of a real specimen  http://www.brazilianfauna.com/threebandedarmadillo.php  Again, my guess is that a Portuguese explorer employed a local indian to create a secret language to protect their discoveries in the new world.  Note also that image 1006137 is a carved sweet potato - compare to this  http://www.antiquemapsandprints.com/p-2316.jpg  - and many other plants appear to be potatoes of which there are hundreds of varieties in South America.
Good point. I'd NEVER use an enema kit as a turkey baster!
ffs, read the front page before posting
Florida Tomato Growers Exchange seems to be just as responsible for the situation if not more-so than Burger King.  Reggie Brown, the executive vice president of the group, described the penny surcharge as “pretty much near un-American.”  They represent 90% of the state's growers.  FTA: &gt;Now the Florida Tomato Growers Exchange has threatened a fine of $100,000 for any grower who accepts an extra penny per pound for migrant wages. The organization claims that such a surcharge would violate “federal and state laws related to antitrust, labor and racketeering.” It has not explained how that extra penny would break those laws; nor has it explained why other surcharges routinely imposed by the growers (for things like higher fuel costs) are perfectly legal.   This sounds like a far cry from their [website](http://www.floridatomatogrowers.org/): &gt;The Florida Tomato Growers Exchange is an agricultural cooperative of Florida tomato growers who operate as socially accountable farm employers by participating in comprehensive programs that certify employment, health, housing and safety practices. The industry is strongly committed to supporting long-term solutions that improve the lives of their employees.  Somebody is lying.
The man who gets the system in his car isn't blasting it loudly for everyone to hear.  Car audio enthusiasts get plenty of sound deadening, which serves two purposes. First, it makes the music in the car sound better. Second, it keeps sound in the car, and therefore minimizes what people outside here. The man who gets the stereo on his bike is viewed to be obnoxious.
&gt;Clearly, we must elect former Arkansas Governor Mike Huckabee or the nation -- nay, western civilization itself! -- is doomed.  This illustrated the problem with christian fundamentalist thinking - its 'all or nothing'.  Thus, their main persuasive ammunition is fear.  Mor than anything, christianity is about fear. Without it, they are powerless.
Like warcraft DT Map.May be take a little time to download it.  BestOnGame.com offers you more than 2000 free games and online games, including sports games, action games, puzzle games, flash games, multiplayer games, rpg games and more.
I'd be more inclined to believe that cruelty and violations of justice ARE more intrinsic to organized religion than to athiesm. Organized religion, almost by definition, demonizes unbelievers. That's always the first step necessary for unleashing the worst kind of human excesses against fellow human beings.
Yes, but that distinction is pretty hard to make in Hinduism.
Wow; it feels like we're back in the '80s or '90s again!
I live in Boston and I used to before the cops started cracking down. A friend of mine who grew up in a decent area of the city kept a hockey stick in the entryway of his house to chase them off when he was in high school. And a friend of mine who now lives in San Francisco has been assaulted by someone yelling "spare change motherfucker". Exception to the rule? Maybe. But it happens more often than you seem to think.  And I never said I was dirt poor. What, do only the people in the gated community have the internets in your area?
You mean you have to be born a jew or that you're a jew for life?  If the latter then seriously read the article... Christ = Messiah for Jews = Christianity  Muhammad = Prophet for Jews = Islam
Employers have a psychological and physical advantage over most employees - since without employment, a worker faces extreme hardship while s/he finds a job.  It's easier to go along with bullying, and hope the situation blows over, than to fight against it and risk the well-being of your family.
It's in Alabama what do you expect?  And I can say that, I live in Alabama.
I'm sorry but...  don't you think this is positive reinforcement towards princess cruise lines? They get double the money for ripping her off.
Makes me want to navigate to CNN.
See, because he said "extremist's heads" instead of "extremists' heads."  What do you mean, grammar nitpicking isn't funny?
Hucks...   millihuck, centihuck, kilohuck..  Mike Huckabee is 25000 Kilohucks.
D. Many others are sorry the dam bomb wasn't real and Clinton in there.
It doesn't get any easier then. 
Not a lobby, but one guy using Tor - who actually isn't racist, but is just rather enjoying modding up unpopular comments to wind guys like you up.
They are drumming up fears again, its really looking like a war with iran is coming.
IT'S OVER NINE THOUSAAAAND!
